Last updated August 30th, 2023.
Thank you for choosing to use service provided by Manjun Tech ("
Company
," "
we
," "
us
," or "
our
"). We are committed to protecting your personal information and your right to privacy. If you have any questions or concerns about this privacy notice or our practices with regard to your personal information, please contact us at
feedback@manjun.tech
.
This privacy notice describes how we might use your information if you:
Download and use our mobile application — WidgetX, FocuZz，DayPlus,Pomo Up
Engage with us in other related ways ― including any sales, marketing, or events
In this privacy notice, if we refer to:
"
App
," we are referring to any application of ours that references or links to this policy, including any listed above
"
Services
," we are referring to our App, and other related services, including any sales, marketing, or events
The purpose of this privacy notice is to explain to you in the clearest way possible what information we collect, how we use it, and what rights you have in relation to it. If there are any terms in this privacy notice that you do not agree with, please discontinue use of our Services immediately.
Please read this privacy notice carefully, as it will help you understand what we do with the information that we collect.
1. WHAT INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT?
Personal information you disclose to us
In Short:
We collect personal information that you provide to us.
We collect personal information that you voluntarily provide to us when you express an interest in obtaining information about us or our products and Services, when you participate in activities on the App or otherwise when you contact us.
The personal information that we collect depends on the context of your interactions with us and the App, the choices you make and the products and features you use. The personal information we collect may include the following:
Payment Data.
We may collect data necessary to process your payment if you make purchases, such as your payment instrument number (such as a credit card number), and the security code associated with your payment instrument. All payment data is stored by App Store, Wechat and Alipay. You may find their privacy notice link(s) here:
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/
,
https://www.wechat.com/en/privacy_policy.html
and
https://render.alipay.com/p/f/agreementpages/alipaywalletprivacypolicy_en.html
.
All personal information that you provide to us must be true, complete and accurate, and you must notify us of any changes to such personal information.
Information automatically collected
We automatically collect certain information when you visit, use or navigate the App. This information does not reveal your specific identity (like your name or contact information) but may include device and usage information, such as your IP address, browser and device characteristics, operating system, language preferences, referring URLs, device name, country, location, information about how and when you use our App and other technical information. This information is primarily needed to maintain the security and operation of our App, and for our internal analytics and reporting purposes.
The information we collect includes:
Log and Usage Data.
Log and usage data is service-related, diagnostic, usage and performance information our servers automatically collect when you access or use our App and which we record in log files. Depending on how you interact with us, this log data may include your IP address, device information, browser type and settings and information about your activity in the App (such as the date/time stamps associated with your usage, pages and files viewed, searches and other actions you take such as which features you use), device event information (such as system activity, error reports (sometimes called 'crash dumps') and hardware settings).
Information collected through our App
If you use our App, we also collect the following information:
Geolocation Information
.
We may request access or permission to and track location-based information from your mobile device, either continuously or while you are using our App, to provide certain location-based services. If you wish to change our access or permissions, you may do so in your device's settings.
Mobile Device Access.
We may request access or permission to certain features from your mobile device, including your mobile device's and other features. If you wish to change our access or permissions, you may do so in your device's settings.
Mobile Device Data
.
We automatically collect device information (such as your mobile device ID, model and manufacturer), operating system, version information and system configuration information, device and application identification numbers, browser type and version, hardware model Internet service provider and/or mobile carrier, and Internet Protocol (IP) address (or proxy server). If you are using our App, we may also collect information about the phone network associated with your mobile device, your mobile device’s operating system or platform, the type of mobile device you use, your mobile device’s unique device ID and information about the features of our App you accessed.
Push Notifications.
We may request to send you push notifications regarding your account or certain features of the App. If you wish to opt-out from receiving these types of communications, you may turn them off in your device's settings.
This information is primarily needed to maintain the security and operation of our App, for troubleshooting and for our internal analytics and reporting purposes.
Information collected from other sources
In order to enhance our ability to provide relevant marketing, offers and services to you and update our records, we may obtain information about you from other sources, such as public databases, joint marketing partners, affiliate programs, data providers, as well as from other third parties. This information includes user behavior data, Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, social media profiles, social media URLs and custom profiles, for purposes of targeted advertising and event promotion.
2. HOW DO WE USE YOUR INFORMATION?
We use personal information collected via our App for a variety of business purposes described below. We process your personal information for these purposes in reliance on our legitimate business interests, in order to enter into or perform a contract with you, with your consent, and/or for compliance with our legal obligations. We indicate the specific processing grounds we rely on next to each purpose listed below.
We use the information we collect or receive:
Fulfill and manage your orders.
We may use your information to fulfill and manage your orders, payments, returns, and exchanges made through the App.
Administer prize draws and competitions.
We may use your information to administer prize draws and competitions when you elect to participate in our competitions.
To deliver and facilitate delivery of services to the user.
We may use your information to provide you with the requested service.
To respond to user inquiries/offer support to users.
We may use your information to respond to your inquiries and solve any potential issues you might have with the use of our Services.
3. WILL YOUR INFORMATION BE SHARED WITH ANYONE?
We may process or share your data that we hold based on the following legal basis:
Consent:
We may process your data if you have given us specific consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose.
Legitimate Interests:
We may process your data when it is reasonably necessary to achieve our legitimate business interests.
Performance of a Contract:
Where we have entered into a contract with you, we may process your personal information to fulfill the terms of our contract.
Legal Obligations:
We may disclose your information where we are legally required to do so in order to comply with applicable law, governmental requests, a judicial proceeding, court order, or legal process, such as in response to a court order or a subpoena (including in response to public authorities to meet national security or law enforcement requirements).
Vital Interests:
We may disclose your information where we believe it is necessary to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding potential violations of our policies, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety of any person and illegal activities, or as evidence in litigation in which we are involved.
More specifically, we may need to process your data or share your personal information in the following situations:
Business Transfers.
We may share or transfer your information in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
Vendors, Consultants and Other Third-Party Service Providers.
We may share your data with third-party vendors, service providers, contractors or agents who perform services for us or on our behalf and require access to such information to do that work. Examples include: payment processing, data analysis, email delivery, hosting services, customer service and marketing efforts. We may allow selected third parties to use tracking technology on the App, which will enable them to collect data on our behalf about how you interact with our App over time. This information may be used to, among other things, analyze and track data, determine the popularity of certain content, pages or features, and better understand online activity. Unless described in this notice, we do not share, sell, rent or trade any of your information with third parties for their promotional purposes. We have contracts in place with our data processors, which are designed to help safeguard your personal information. This means that they cannot do anything with your personal information unless we have instructed them to do it. They will also not share your personal information with any organization apart from us. They also commit to protect the data they hold on our behalf and to retain it for the period we instruct.
Third-Party Advertisers.
We may use third-party advertising companies to serve ads when you visit or use the App. These companies may use information about your visits to our Website(s) and other websites that are contained in web cookies and other tracking technologies in order to provide advertisements about goods and services of interest to you.
Affiliates.
We may share your information with our affiliates, in which case we will require those affiliates to honor this privacy notice. Affiliates include our parent company and any subsidiaries, joint venture partners or other companies that we control or that are under common control with us.
Business Partners.
We may share your information with our business partners to offer you certain products, services or promotions.
Offer Wall.
Our App may display a third-party hosted "offer wall." Such an offer wall allows third-party advertisers to offer virtual currency, gifts, or other items to users in return for the acceptance and completion of an advertisement offer. Such an offer wall may appear in our App and be displayed to you based on certain data, such as your geographic area or demographic information. When you click on an offer wall, you will be brought to an external website belonging to other persons and will leave our App. A unique identifier, such as your user ID, will be shared with the offer wall provider in order to prevent fraud and properly credit your account with the relevant reward. Please note that we do not control third-party websites and have no responsibility in relation to the content of such websites. The inclusion of a link towards a third-party website does not imply an endorsement by us of such website. Accordingly, we do not make any warranty regarding such third-party websites and we will not be liable for any loss or damage caused by the use of such websites. In addition, when you access any third-party website, please understand that your rights while accessing and using those websites will be governed by the privacy notice and terms of service relating to the use of those websites.
4. WHO WILL YOUR INFORMATION BE SHARED WITH?
We only share and disclose your information with the following categories of third parties.
Name
Third party entity
Official website or privacy policy
Scope of shared information
Purpose of use
Methods of sharing
Firebase
Google Inc.
https://policies.google.cn/privacy
MAC address, unique device identifier code, geographic location information, application information, and network status and type.
Statistical analysis and crash event statistics.
Automatic collection
umeng+SDK
umeng.com
https://www.umeng.com/page/policy
MAC address, unique device identifier code, geographic location information, network status and type, device brand, model, software version, and application information.
Statistical analysis and crash event statistics.
Automatic collection
AdMob
Google Inc.
https://policies.google.com/privacy
MAC address, unique device identifier code, geographic location information, application information, and network status and type.
ad management service provider
Automatic collection
5. WHAT IS OUR STANCE ON THIRD-PARTY WEBSITES?
The App may contain advertisements from third parties that are not affiliated with us and which may link to other websites, online services or mobile applications. We cannot guarantee the safety and privacy of data you provide to any third parties. Any data collected by third parties is not covered by this privacy notice. We are not responsible for the content or privacy and security practices and policies of any third parties, including other websites, services or applications that may be linked to or from the App. You should review the policies of such third parties and contact them directly to respond to your questions.
6. HOW LONG DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION?
We will only keep your personal information for as long as it is necessary for the purposes set out in this privacy notice, unless a longer retention period is required or permitted by law (such as tax, accounting or other legal requirements). No purpose in this notice will require us keeping your personal information for longer than 6 months.
When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your personal information, we will either delete or anonymize such information, or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), then we will securely store your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
7. HOW DO WE KEEP YOUR INFORMATION SAFE?
We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational security measures designed to protect the security of any personal information we process. However, despite our safeguards and efforts to secure your information, no electronic transmission over the Internet or information storage technology can be guaranteed to be 100% secure, so we cannot promise or guarantee that hackers, cybercriminals, or other unauthorized third parties will not be able to defeat our security, and improperly collect, access, steal, or modify your information. Although we will do our best to protect your personal information, transmission of personal information to and from our App is at your own risk. You should only access the App within a secure environment.
8. WHAT ARE YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS?
In some regions (like the EEA and UK), you have certain rights under applicable data protection laws. These may include the right (i) to request access and obtain a copy of your personal information, (ii) to request rectification or erasure; (iii) to restrict the processing of your personal information; and (iv) if applicable, to data portability. In certain circumstances, you may also have the right to object to the processing of your personal information. To make such a request, please use the
contact details
provided below. We will consider and act upon any request in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
If we are relying on your consent to process your personal information, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. Please note however that this will not affect the lawfulness of the processing before its withdrawal, nor will it affect the processing of your personal information conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
If you are a resident in the EEA or UK and you believe we are unlawfully processing your personal information, you also have the right to complain to your local data protection supervisory authority. You can find their contact details here:
https://ec.europa.eu/justice/data-protection/bodies/authorities/index_en.htm
.
If you are a resident in Switzerland, the contact details for the data protection authorities are available here:
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home.html
.
9. CONTROLS FOR DO-NOT-TRACK FEATURES
Most web browsers and some mobile operating systems and mobile applications include a Do-Not-Track ("DNT") feature or setting you can activate to signal your privacy preference not to have data about your online browsing activities monitored and collected. At this stage no uniform technology standard for recognizing and implementing DNT signals has been finalized. As such, we do not currently respond to DNT browser signals or any other mechanism that automatically communicates your choice not to be tracked online. If a standard for online tracking is adopted that we must follow in the future, we will inform you about that practice in a revised version of this privacy notice.
10. DO CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS HAVE SPECIFIC PRIVACY RIGHTS?
California Civil Code Section 1798.83, also known as the "Shine The Light" law, permits our users who are California residents to request and obtain from us, once a year and free of charge, information about categories of personal information (if any) we disclosed to third parties for direct marketing purposes and the names and addresses of all third parties with which we shared personal information in the immediately preceding calendar year. If you are a California resident and would like to make such a request, please submit your request in writing to us using the contact information provided below.
If you are under 18 years of age, reside in California, and have a registered account with the App, you have the right to request removal of unwanted data that you publicly post on the App. To request removal of such data, please contact us using the contact information provided below, and include the email address associated with your account and a statement that you reside in California. We will make sure the data is not publicly displayed on the App, but please be aware that the data may not be completely or comprehensively removed from all our systems (e.g. backups, etc.).
CCPA Privacy Notice
The California Code of Regulations defines a "resident" as:
(1) every individual who is in the State of California for other than a temporary or transitory purpose and
(2) every individual who is domiciled in the State of California who is outside the State of California for a temporary or transitory purpose
All other individuals are defined as "non-residents."
If this definition of "resident" applies to you, we must adhere to certain rights and obligations regarding your personal information.
What categories of personal information do we collect?
We have collected the following categories of personal information in the past twelve (12) months:
Categories
Category
Examples
Collected
A. Identifiers
Contact details, such as real name, alias, postal address, telephone or mobile contact number, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address and account name
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute
Name, contact information, education, employment, employment history and financial information
September 26, 2021
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Gender and date of birth
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
D. Commercial information
Transaction information, purchase history, financial details and payment information
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
E. Biometric information
Fingerprints and voiceprints
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
F. Internet or other similar network activity
Browsing history, search history, online behavior, interest data, and interactions with our and other websites, applications, systems and advertisements
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
G. Geolocation data
Device location
September 26, 2021
H. Audio, electronic, visual, thermal, olfactory, or similar information
Images and audio, video or call recordings created in connection with our business activities
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
I. Professional or employment-related information
Business contact details in order to provide you our services at a business level, job title as well as work history and professional qualifications if you apply for a job with us
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
J. Education Information
Student records and directory information
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Inferences drawn from any of the collected personal information listed above to create a profile or summary about, for example, an individual’s preferences and characteristics
September 27, 2021 11:32 AM (GMT+8)
We may also collect other personal information outside of these categories instances where you interact with us in-person, online, or by phone or mail in the context of:
Receiving help through our customer support channels;
Participation in customer surveys or contests; and
Facilitation in the delivery of our Services and to respond to your inquiries.
How do we use and share your personal information?
More information about our data collection and sharing practices can be found in this privacy notice.
You may contact us by email at
feedback@manjun.tech
, or by referring to the contact details at the bottom of this document.
If you are using an authorized agent to exercise your right to opt-out we may deny a request if the authorized agent does not submit proof that they have been validly authorized to act on your behalf.
Will your information be shared with anyone else?
We may disclose your personal information with our service providers pursuant to a written contract between us and each service provider. Each service provider is a for-profit entity that processes the information on our behalf.
We may use your personal information for our own business purposes, such as for undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration. This is not considered to be "selling" of your personal data.
Manjun Tech has disclosed the following categories of personal information to third parties for a business or commercial purpose in the preceding twelve (12) months:
Category B. Personal information, as defined in the California Customer Records law, such as your name, contact information, education, employment, employment history and financial information.
The categories of third parties to whom we disclosed personal information for a business or commercial purpose can be found under "WHO WILL YOUR INFORMATION BE SHARED WITH?".
Manjun Tech has not sold any personal information to third parties for a business or commercial purpose in the preceding twelve (12) months. Manjun Tech will not sell personal information in the future belonging to website visitors, users and other consumers.
Your rights with respect to your personal data
Right to request deletion of the data - Request to delete
You can ask for the deletion of your personal information. If you ask us to delete your personal information, we will respect your request and delete your personal information, subject to certain exceptions provided by law, such as (but not limited to) the exercise by another consumer of his or her right to free speech, our compliance requirements resulting from a legal obligation or any processing that may be required to protect against illegal activities.
Right to be informed - Request to know
Depending on the circumstances, you have a right to know:
whether we collect and use your personal information;
the categories of personal information that we collect;
the purposes for which the collected personal information is used;
whether we sell your personal information to third parties;
the categories of personal information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose;
the categories of third parties to whom the personal information was sold or disclosed for a business purpose; and
the business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling personal information.
In accordance with applicable law, we are not obligated to provide or delete consumer information that is de-identified in response to a consumer request or to re-identify individual data to verify a consumer request.
Right to Non-Discrimination for the Exercise of a Consumer’s Privacy Rights
We will not discriminate against you if you exercise your privacy rights.
Verification process
Upon receiving your request, we will need to verify your identity to determine you are the same person about whom we have the information in our system. These verification efforts require us to ask you to provide information so that we can match it with information you have previously provided us. For instance, depending on the type of request you submit, we may ask you to provide certain information so that we can match the information you provide with the information we already have on file, or we may contact you through a communication method (e.g. phone or email) that you have previously provided to us. We may also use other verification methods as the circumstances dictate.
We will only use personal information provided in your request to verify your identity or authority to make the request. To the extent possible, we will avoid requesting additional information from you for the purposes of verification. If, however, we cannot verify your identity from the information already maintained by us, we may request that you provide additional information for the purposes of verifying your identity, and for security or fraud-prevention purposes. We will delete such additionally provided information as soon as we finish verifying you.
Other privacy rights
you may object to the processing of your personal data
you may request correction of your personal data if it is incorrect or no longer relevant, or ask to restrict the processing of the data
you can designate an authorized agent to make a request under the CCPA on your behalf. We may deny a request from an authorized agent that does not submit proof that they have been validly authorized to act on your behalf in accordance with the CCPA.
you may request to opt-out from future selling of your personal information to third parties. Upon receiving a request to opt-out, we will act upon the request as soon as feasibly possible, but no later than 15 days from the date of the request submission.
To exercise these rights, you can contact us by email at
feedback@manjun.tech
, or by referring to the contact details at the bottom of this document. If you have a complaint about how we handle your data, we would like to hear from you.
11. DO WE MAKE UPDATES TO THIS NOTICE?
In Short:
Yes, we will update this notice as necessary to stay compliant with relevant laws.
We may update this privacy notice from time to time. The updated version will be indicated by an updated "Revised" date and the updated version will be effective as soon as it is accessible. If we make material changes to this privacy notice, we may notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes or by directly sending you a notification. We encourage you to review this privacy notice frequently to be informed of how we are protecting your information.
12. HOW CAN YOU REVIEW, UPDATE, OR DELETE THE DATA WE COLLECT FROM YOU?
If you have questions or comments about this notice, you may email us at
feedback@manjun.tech
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.apple.com/legal/privacy/en-ww/:
Choose another country or region to see content specific to your location and shop online.
Ireland
Ireland
Other country or region
Continue
Apple
Store
Shop the Latest
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
Accessories
Find a Store
Order Status
Apple Trade In
Financing
Personal Setup
Certified Refurbished
Education
Business
Veterans and Military
Government
Mac
Explore All Mac
MacBook Air
MacBook Pro
iMac
Mac mini
Mac Studio
Mac Pro
Displays
Compare Mac
Switch from PC to Mac
Shop Mac
Help Me Choose
Mac Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Mac Support
AppleCare+ for Mac
macOS Sequoia
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
Continuity
iCloud+
Mac for Business
Education
iPad
Explore All iPad
iPad Pro
iPad Air
iPad
iPad mini
Apple Pencil
Keyboards
Compare iPad
Why iPad
Shop iPad
iPad Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
iPad Support
AppleCare+ for iPad
iPadOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iCloud+
Education
iPhone
Explore All iPhone
iPhone 16 Pro
iPhone 16
iPhone 16e
iPhone 15
Compare iPhone
Switch from Android
Shop iPhone
iPhone Accessories
Apple Trade In
Carrier Deals at Apple
Financing
iPhone Support
AppleCare+ for iPhone
iOS 18
Apple Intelligence
Apps by Apple
iPhone Privacy
iCloud+
Wallet, Pay, Card
Siri
Watch
Explore All Apple Watch
Apple Watch Series 10
Apple Watch Ultra 2
Apple Watch SE
Apple Watch Nike
Apple Watch Hermès
Compare Watch
Why Apple Watch
Shop Apple Watch
Apple Watch Studio
Apple Watch Bands
Apple Watch Accessories
Apple Trade In
Financing
Apple Watch Support
AppleCare+
watchOS 11
Apple Watch For Your Kids
Apps by Apple
Apple Fitness+
Vision
Explore Apple Vision Pro
Guided Tour
Tech Specs
Shop Apple Vision Pro
Apple Vision Pro Accessories
Book a Demo
Financing
Apple Vision Pro Support
AppleCare+
visionOS 2
AirPods
Explore All AirPods
AirPods 4
AirPods Pro 2
AirPods Max
Compare AirPods
Shop AirPods
AirPods Accessories
AirPods Support
AppleCare+ for Headphones
Hearing Health
Apple Music
TV & Home
Explore TV & Home
Apple TV 4K
HomePod
HomePod mini
Shop Apple TV 4K
Shop HomePod
Shop HomePod mini
Shop Siri Remote
TV & Home Accessories
Apple TV Support
HomePod Support
AppleCare+
Apple TV app
Apple TV+
Home app
Apple Music
Siri
AirPlay
Entertainment
Explore Entertainment
Apple One
Apple TV+
Apple Music
Apple Arcade
Apple Fitness+
Apple News+
Apple Podcasts
Apple Books
App Store
Apple TV+ Support
Apple Music Support
Accessories
Shop All Accessories
Mac
iPad
iPhone
Apple Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
TV & Home
Made by Apple
Beats by Dr. Dre
AirTag
Support
iPhone
Mac
iPad
Watch
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Music
TV
Explore Support
Community
Check Coverage
Repair
Get AppleCare+
Apple Account and Password
Billing & Subscriptions
Accessibility
Find a Store
Apple Vision Pro
AirPods
Apple Intelligence
Apple Trade In
0
+
Privacy
Local Nav Open Menu
Local Nav Close Menu
Overview
Features
Control
Labels
Transparency Report
Privacy Policy
English
Choose your preferred language
At Apple, we believe strongly in fundamental privacy rights — and that those fundamental rights should not differ depending on where you live in the world.
That’s why we treat any data that relates to an identified or identifiable individual or that is linked or linkable to them by Apple as “personal data,” no matter where the individual lives.
This means that data that directly identifies you — such as your name — is personal data, and also data that does not directly identify you, but that can reasonably be used to identify you — such as the serial number of your device — is personal data. Aggregated data is considered non‑personal data for the purposes of this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy covers how
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
(collectively, “Apple”) handles personal data whether you interact with us on our websites, through Apple apps (such as Apple Music or Wallet), or in person (including by phone or when visiting an Apple Store). Apple may also link to third parties on our services or make third-party apps available for download in our App Store. Apple’s Privacy Policy does not apply to how third parties define personal data or how they use it. We encourage you to read their privacy policies and know your privacy rights before interacting with them.
At Apple, we respect your ability to know, access, correct, transfer, restrict the processing of, and delete your personal data. We have provided these rights to our global customer base and if you choose to exercise these privacy rights, you have the right not to be treated in a discriminatory way nor to receive a lesser degree of service from Apple. Where you are requested to consent to the processing of your personal data by Apple, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
To exercise your privacy rights and choices, including where a third-party service provider is acting on Apple’s behalf, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
for Apple or
shazam.com/privacy
for Shazam.
To help protect the security of your personal data, you must sign in to your account and your identity will be verified. If you want to obtain a copy of personal data that is not currently available from
privacy.apple.com
, you can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the applicable regulator.
There may be situations where we cannot grant your request — for example, if you ask us to delete your transaction data and Apple is legally obligated to keep a record of that transaction to comply with law. We may also decline to grant a request where doing so would undermine our legitimate use of data for anti-fraud and security purposes, such as when you request deletion of an account that is being investigated for security concerns. Other reasons your privacy request may be denied are if it jeopardizes the privacy of others, is frivolous or vexatious, or would be extremely impractical or unreasonable.
If you live in California and you cannot access Apple’s Data and Privacy page,
you or your authorized agent can make a request at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or by calling 1-800-275-2273.
For more information on exercising your rights, visit
support.apple.com/102283
.
At Apple, we believe that you can have great products and great privacy. This means that we strive to
collect only the personal data that we need
. The personal data Apple collects depends on how you interact with Apple. Descriptions of how Apple handles personal data for certain individual services are available at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
When you create an Apple Account, apply for commercial credit, purchase and/or activate a product or device, download a software update, register for a class at an Apple Store, connect to our services, contact us (including by social media), participate in an online survey, or otherwise interact with Apple, we may collect a variety of information, including:
Account Information.
Your Apple Account and related account details, including email address, devices registered, account status, and age
Device Information.
Data from which your device could be identified, such as device serial number, or about your device, such as browser type
Contact Information
. Data such as name, email address, physical address, phone number, or other contact information
Payment Information. Data about your billing address and method of payment, such as bank details, credit, debit, or other payment card information
Transaction Information.
Data about purchases of Apple products and services or transactions facilitated by Apple, including purchases on Apple platforms
Fraud Prevention Information.
Data used to help identify and prevent fraud, including a device trust score
Usage Data.
Data about your activity on and use of our offerings, such as app launches within our services, including browsing history; search history; product interaction; crash data, performance and other diagnostic data; and other usage data
Location Information
. Precise location only to support services such as Find My or where you agree for region-specific services, and coarse location
Health Information.
Data relating to the health status of an individual, including data related to one’s physical or mental health or condition. Personal health data also includes data that can be used to make inferences about or detect the health status of an individual. If you participate in a study using an Apple Health Research Study app, the policy governing the privacy of your personal data is described in the
Apple Health Study Apps Privacy Policy
.
Fitness Information.
Details relating to your fitness and exercise information where you choose to share them
Financial Information.
Details including salary, income, and assets information where collected, and information related to Apple-branded financial offerings
Government ID Data.
In certain jurisdictions, we may ask for a government-issued ID in limited circumstances, including when setting up a wireless account and activating your device, for the purpose of extending commercial credit, managing reservations, or as required by law
Other Information You Provide to Us.
Details such as the content of your communications with Apple, including interactions with customer support and contacts through social media channels
You are not required to provide the personal data that we have requested. However, if you choose not to do so, in many cases we will not be able to provide you with our products or services or respond to requests you may have.
Apple may receive personal data about you from other
individuals
, from businesses or third parties acting
at your direction
, from our
partners
who work with us to provide our products and services and assist us in security and fraud prevention, and from other
lawful sources.
Individuals.
Apple may collect data about you from other individuals — for example, if that individual has sent you a product or gift card, invited you to participate in an Apple service or forum, or shared content with you.
At Your Direction.
You may direct other individuals or third parties to share data with Apple. For example, you may direct your mobile carrier to share data about your carrier account with Apple for account activation, or for your loyalty program to share information about your participation so that you can earn rewards for Apple purchases.
Apple Partners.
We may also validate the information you provide — for example, when creating an Apple Account, with a third party for security, and for fraud-prevention purposes.
To power features such as search and as a source for our foundational AI models, Apple uses Applebot, a web crawler, to crawl information that is publicly available on the internet. We have measures in place to reduce the amount of personal data we collect and make no attempt to connect data crawled to any individual Apple user, or to build profiles about individuals. Your private personal data is not used to train our foundational AI models. To exercise your right as an individual to opt out of processing, visit the
Apple Intelligence Privacy Inquiries form
. For more information about Applebot, visit
support.apple.com/120320
.
For research and development purposes, we may use datasets such as those that contain images, voices, or other data that could be associated with an identifiable person. When acquiring such datasets, we do so in accordance with applicable law, including law in the jurisdiction in which the dataset is hosted. When using such datasets for research and development, we do not attempt to reidentify individuals who may appear therein.
Apple uses personal data to power our services, to process your transactions, to communicate with you, for security and fraud prevention, and to comply with law. We may also use personal data for other purposes with your consent.
Apple uses your personal data only when we have a valid legal basis to do so.
Depending on the circumstance, Apple may rely on your consent or the fact that the processing is necessary to fulfill a contract with you, protect your vital interests or those of other persons, or to comply with law. We may also process your personal data where we believe it is in our or others’ legitimate interests, taking into consideration your interests, rights, and expectations. More information is available in the product-specific information embedded in our products and features as described above. If you have questions about the legal basis, you can contact the Data Protection Officer at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Power Our Services.
Apple collects personal data necessary to power our services, which may include personal data collected to improve our offerings, for internal purposes such as auditing or data analysis, or for troubleshooting. For example, if you would like to access a song through an Apple Music subscription, we collect data on what songs you play in order to provide you with the content requested and for royalty purposes.
Process Your Transactions.
To process transactions, Apple must collect data such as your name, purchase, and payment information.
Communicate with You.
To respond to communications, reach out to you about your transactions or account, market our products and services, provide other relevant information, or request information or feedback. From time to time, we may use your personal data to send important notices, such as communications about purchases and changes to our terms, conditions, and policies. Because this information is important to your interaction with Apple, you may not opt out of receiving these important notices.
Security and Fraud Prevention.
To protect individuals, employees, and Apple and for loss prevention and to prevent fraud, including to protect individuals, employees, and Apple for the benefit of all our users, and prescreening or scanning uploaded content for potentially illegal content, including child sexual exploitation material.
Personal Data Used for Personalization.
If you choose to personalize your services or communications where such options are available, Apple will use information that we collect so that we can offer you those personalized services or communications. You can learn more about how relevant services use information to personalize your experience by reviewing the privacy information presented when you first use a service that asks to use your personal data. We make this information easy to find by presenting it with our Data & Privacy icon; it’s also available at all times on your Apple device and online at
apple.com/legal/privacy/data
.
Comply with Law.
To comply with applicable law — for example, to satisfy tax or reporting obligations, or to comply with a lawful governmental request.
Apple does not use algorithms or profiling to make any decision that would significantly affect you without the opportunity for human review. Apple also does not use or disclose sensitive personal data for any purposes that would require a user to exercise a right to limit processing according to California law.
Apple retains personal data only for so long as necessary to fulfill the purposes for which it was collected, including as described in this Privacy Policy or in our service-specific privacy notices, or as required by law. We will retain your personal data for the period necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy and our service-specific privacy notices. When assessing retention periods, we first carefully examine whether it is necessary to retain the personal data collected and, if retention is required, work to retain the personal data for the shortest possible period permissible under law.
Apple may share personal data with
Apple-affiliated companies
,
service providers
who act on our behalf, our
partners
,
developers, and publishers
, or others
at your direction
. Further, Apple does not share personal data with third parties for their own marketing purposes.
Service Providers.
Apple may engage third parties to act as our service providers and perform certain tasks on our behalf, such as processing or storing data, including personal data, in connection with your use of our services and delivering products to customers. Apple service providers are obligated to handle personal data consistent with this Privacy Policy and according to our instructions. They cannot use the personal data we share for their own purposes and must delete or return the personal data once they’ve fulfilled our request.
Partners.
At times, Apple may partner with third parties to provide services or other offerings. For example, Apple financial offerings like Apple Card and Apple Cash are offered by Apple and our partners. Apple requires its partners to protect your personal data.
Developers and Publishers from Whom You Get a Subscription.
If you purchase a third-party subscription from the App Store or within Apple News, we create a Subscriber ID that is unique to you and the developer or publisher. The Subscriber ID may be used to provide reports to the developer or publisher, which include information about the subscription you purchased and your country of residence. If you cancel all of your subscriptions from a particular developer or publisher, the Subscriber ID will reset after 180 days if you do not resubscribe. This information is provided to developers or publishers so that they can understand the performance of their subscriptions.
Others.
Apple may share personal data with others at your direction or with your consent, such as when we share information with your carrier to activate your account. We may also disclose information about you if we determine that for purposes of national security, law enforcement, or other issues of public importance, disclosure is necessary or appropriate. We may also disclose information about you where there is a lawful basis for doing so, if we determine that disclosure is reasonably necessary to enforce our terms and conditions or to protect our operations or users, or in the event of a reorganization, merger, or sale.
Apple does not sell your personal data including as “sale” is defined in Nevada and California. Apple also does not “share” your personal data as that term is defined in California.
At Apple, we believe that great privacy rests on great security. We use
administrative, technical, and physical safeguards
to protect your personal data, taking into account the nature of the personal data and the processing, and the threats posed. We are constantly working to improve on these safeguards to help keep your personal data secure. For more information, visit our
Apple Platform Security
guide.
Apple understands the importance of safeguarding the personal data of children, which we consider to be an
individual under the age of 13 or the equivalent age as specified by law in your jurisdiction
. That is why Apple has implemented additional processes and protections to help keep children’s personal data safe.
To access certain Apple services, a child must have a child Apple Account. A child Apple Account may be created by the
parent
or, in the case of a Managed Apple Account, by the
child’s educational institution
.
Parents.
To create a child account, parents must review the
Family Privacy Disclosure for Children
, which describes how Apple handles children’s personal data. If they agree, the parent must provide Apple with a verifiable parental consent.
Educational Institutions.
Educational institutions that participate in the Apple School Manager Program may also create Apple IDs for students, called “Managed Apple IDs.” These schools are required to agree to the
Managed Apple IDs for Students Disclosure
which is included as Exhibit A to the Apple School Manager Agreement.
If we learn that a child’s personal data was collected without appropriate authorization, it will be deleted as soon as possible.
To exercise privacy rights for your child’s information, visit the Apple Data and Privacy page at
privacy.apple.com
and sign in to their account.
Apple’s websites, online services, interactive applications, and advertisements may use
“cookies” and other technologies
such as web beacons.
These technologies help us to better understand user behavior including for security and fraud prevention purposes, tell us which parts of our websites people have visited, and facilitate and measure the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches.
Communications Cookies.
These cookies are used to enable network traffic to and from Apple’s systems, including by helping us detect any errors.
Strictly Necessary Cookies.
These cookies are set as required to provide a specific feature or service that you have accessed or requested. For example, they allow us to display our websites in the proper format and language, to authenticate and verify your transactions, and to preserve the contents of your Bag when shopping online at
apple.com
.
Other Cookies.
These cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with our websites and online services, including by helping us to assess the effectiveness of advertisements and web searches. Apple also uses these cookies to remember choices you make while browsing, so we can provide you with a customized experience.
If you prefer that Apple not use cookies, we provide you with the means to disable their use. If you want to disable cookies and you’re using the Safari web browser, choose “Block all cookies” in Safari’s privacy settings. If you are using a different browser, check with your provider to find out how to disable cookies. Certain features of the Apple website may not be available if all cookies are disabled.
In addition to cookies, Apple uses other technologies that help us achieve similar objectives.
In some email messages Apple sends to you, we provide a “click-through URL” that links you to content on the Apple website. When you click one of these URLs, they pass through a separate server before arriving at the destination page on our website. We track this click-through to help us determine interest in particular topics and measure whether we are communicating with you effectively. If you prefer not to be tracked in this way, you should not click graphic or text links in email messages.
Apple generally treats data we collect using these cookies and similar technologies as non-personal data.
However, to the extent that Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or similar identifiers are considered personal data by local law, we also treat these identifiers as personal data in those regions. In addition, Apple sometimes combines non-personal data collected from these technologies with other personal data Apple holds. When we combine data in this way, we treat the combined data as personal data for purposes of this Privacy Policy.
Ads that are delivered by Apple’s advertising platform may appear on the App Store, Apple News, Stocks, and Apple TV app depending on your location. Apple’s advertising platform does not track you, meaning that it does not link user or device data collected from our apps with user or device data collected from third parties for targeted advertising or advertising measurement purposes, and does not share user or device data with data brokers.
If you do not want to receive ads targeted to your interests from Apple's advertising platform in those apps, you can choose to disable Personalized Ads, which will opt your Apple Account out of receiving such ads regardless of what device you are using. On your iOS, iPadOS, or visionOS device, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to Settings > Privacy & Security > Apple Advertising and tapping to turn off Personalized Ads. On your Mac, you can disable Personalized Ads by going to System Settings > Privacy & Security > Privacy > Advertising, then deselecting Personalized Ads. You may still see ads in the App Store, Apple News, or Stocks based on context like your search query or the channel you are reading. If you disable Allow Apps to Request to Track, third-party apps cannot request to use the Advertising Identifier, a non-personal identifier served by the operating system on your device, to track you across apps and websites owned by other companies.
For more information about Apple-delivered advertising and privacy, visit
apple.com/legal/privacy/data/ww/apple-advertising
.
Apple products and offerings connect you to the world. To make that possible,
your personal data may be transferred to or accessed by entities around the world,
including Apple-affiliated companies, to perform processing activities such as those described in this Privacy Policy in connection with your use of our products and services. Apple complies with laws on the transfer of personal data between countries to help ensure your data is protected, wherever it may be.
The Apple entity that controls your personal data may differ depending on where you live.
For example, Apple Store information is controlled by individual retail entities in each country and Apple Media Services-related personal data may be controlled by various Apple entities as reflected in the terms of service. If you do not reside in the U.S., your personal data may be processed by Apple Inc. and other Apple-affiliated companies on behalf of the Apple entity controlling personal data for your jurisdiction. For example, Imagery and associated data collected by Apple around the world to improve Apple Maps and to support our Look Around feature is transferred to Apple Inc. in California.
Personal data relating to individuals in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is controlled by Apple Distribution International Limited in Ireland. Apple’s international transfer of personal data collected in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland is governed by
Standard Contractual Clauses
. If you have questions or would like a copy of Apple’s Standard Contractual Clauses, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
.
Personal data collected by
Apple or an Apple-affiliated company
worldwide is generally stored by Apple Inc. in the United States. Regardless of where your personal data is stored, Apple maintains the same high level of protection and safeguarding measures.
Apple’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Global Cross-Border Privacy Rules (CBPRs) System and the Global Privacy Recognition for Processors (PRP) System. For more information about the Global CBPR and PRP Systems, visit
Global CBPR Forum
. To view our certifications, visit
CBPR System Compliance Directory
. For more information about the scope of our participation, or to submit a privacy inquiry through
BBB National Programs
, our Accountability Agent, visit:
Cross-Border Privacy Rules Program
Privacy Recognition for Processors Program
Personal data relating to individuals in the People’s Republic of China may be processed by Apple in countries outside of the People’s Republic of China, such as Apple Inc. in the United States or Apple Distribution International Limited in the Republic of Ireland. Where this occurs, it will be done in compliance with local laws, including the Personal Information Protection Law. For the purposes of processing set out in this Privacy Policy, Apple may also transfer such personal data to third-party service providers, who may in turn store or transfer the data outside of the People’s Republic of China. For more information, visit
China Mainland Privacy Disclosures
.
To make sure your personal data is secure, we communicate our privacy and security guidelines to Apple employees and strictly enforce privacy safeguards within the company.
If you have questions about Apple’s Privacy Policy or privacy practices including where a third-party service provider is acting on our behalf, or you would like to contact our Data Protection Officer, you can contact us at
apple.com/legal/privacy/contact
or call the
Apple Support number
for your country or region.
You can also ask us questions about how to submit a privacy complaint and we will endeavor to help.
Apple takes your privacy questions seriously. A dedicated team reviews your inquiry to determine how best to respond to your question or concern, including those inquiries received in response to an access or download request. In most cases, all substantive contacts receive a response within seven days. In other cases, we may require additional information or let you know that we need more time to respond.
Where your complaint indicates an improvement could be made in our handling of privacy issues, we will take steps to make such an update at the next reasonable opportunity. In the event that a privacy issue has resulted in a negative impact on you or another person, we will take steps to address that with you or that other person.
You may at any time — including if you are not satisfied with Apple’s response — refer your complaint to the applicable regulator. If you ask us, we will endeavor to provide you with information about relevant complaint avenues which may be applicable to your circumstances.
When there is a material change to this Privacy Policy, we’ll post a notice on this website at least a week in advance of doing so and contact you directly about the change if we have your data on file.
View our CBPR certification
View our PRP certification
Sub-policy 2
https://render.alipay.com/p/f/agreementpages/alipaywalletprivacypolicy_en.html:
Alipay Wallet Privacy Notice
(February 2020)
This Privacy Notice applies to the users of our Alipay Wallet and Alipay Wallet Services (Users) and other relevant individuals worldwide, including: each individual who is a registered member of the AliExpress merchant site, and has registered a separate account with Alipay for making online or offline purchases from the AliExpress merchant site and its corresponding mobile application, AliExpress offline stores, or other online or offline merchants using the Alipay EU Wallet (as defined below).
Alipay Wallet Services are services provided by us and our affiliates (collectively referred to as the Alipay Group) to facilitate payments in connection with the aforementioned online and offline transactions using the e-wallet function (Alipay Wallet) within the AliExpress mobile application (AliExpress App). Unless otherwise indicated or the context requires otherwise, reference to “you” or “your” are intended to refer to a User, and reference to “Alipay”, “we”, “us” or “our” in this Notice and the Agreements include relevant companies in the Alipay Group that are involved in providing the Alipay Wallet Services (each an “Affiliate” or member of the “Alipay Group”).
Please see
here
our terms and conditions for the Alipay Wallet and Alipay Wallet Services, which may contain additional terms regarding privacy and our use of information about you.
We want you to understand:
1.WHAT PERSONAL INFORMATION DO WE COLLECT ABOUT YOU?
We collect and use personal information from and about you, including when you interact with us, register for an Alipay Wallet account, use the Alipay Wallet to make purchases or otherwise conduct financial transactions, or otherwise visit or use our Alipay Wallet Services. The personal information that we collect includes:
· Registration Information: your basic personal details, including first and last name, date of birth, and any other identification information as set out in your identity card, passport or other travel document information and your address proof and/or other information from checks, credit cards, bank statements, address proofs or money orders, contact information (including your address, phone number, email, or other information that permits us to contact you) and other registration details;
· Financial information (including bank account numbers, billing and delivery information, transaction data, credit/debit card numbers (including security codes) and cardholder names, expiration dates and bank statements);
· Payment Transaction details (including name, account number, contact information and/or other information relating to you or another recipient of a payment, remittance or fund transfer); and
· Technical information, including:
· information obtained from the device you use to interact with us (including IP address, geographical location, device identification codes and other features/data that can be used to identify a device), and
· information from your visits to our websites or mobile sites (including browser/platform type and version, internet service provider, operating system, referral source/exit pages, length of visit/usage, page views and any search term you use, device logs in the event of a crash or error report).
2. HOW WE OBTAIN YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We collect personal information about you in connection with the Alipay Wallet Services. For example, we collect your personal information when you browse our website, register as a User of Alipay Wallet, log into your Alipay Wallet account to use our Alipay Wallet Services; or when you participate in one of our loyalty or promotional events, or when you communicate with us by phone, e-mail, webchat or otherwise.
We also receive personal information about you from other sources, including
· AliExpress or any other merchants from which you buy goods or services using Alipay Wallet Services;
· Affiliates, Alipay Group companies and other third party suppliers providing services on our behalf;
· banks and other payment institutions that we cooperate with to provide you with the Alipay Wallet Services;
· credit reference and fraud prevention agencies; and
· publicly available sources.
We combine information that we have about you from various sources including the information you have provided to us.
Please refer to How we use your personal information for more details.
3. HOW WE USE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
We use the information we collect to operate our business, including provision of the Alipay Wallet Services. For example, we may use your personal information for the following purposes:
(1) verifying your identity, including during account creation and payment password reset processes;
(2) verifying your eligibility as a User of the Alipay Wallet (including “know your customer”, anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing checks and verification);
(3) processing, maintaining and managing your registration as a User of the Alipay Wallet;
(4) providing you with Alipay Wallet Services and related User services, including operating the Alipay Wallet Services and enabling transactions, customizing your user experience, facilitating the payments, remittances, fund transfers, settlement of purchase price for goods and services, shipping and related services for purchases, charge-backs, refunds, sending notices about transactions, and responding to your queries, feedback, claims or disputes;
(5) contacting you in relation to our provision of Alipay Wallet Services and other legal purposes, contacting you in connection with any communication preferences or requests you have expressed, asking you for feedback about Alipay Wallet Services or other related products and services;
(6) collecting feedback from you and your staff about our products and services and using such feedback to improve our business and/or customize products and services for you;
(7) sending you direct marketing or other information about products and services offered by us, other Alipay Group companies, our business partners such as members of the Alibaba Group or other third parties; including for promotional purposes;
(8) managing risk, performing creditworthiness and solvency checks, or assessing, detecting, investigating, preventing or remediating fraud, data breaches or other potentially prohibited or illegal activities and otherwise protecting the integrity of our payments platform;
(9) detecting, investigating, preventing or remediating violations of your agreements with us or any merchant or any applicable policy, industry standards, guidelines, laws and regulations and our policies;
(10) making disclosures as may be required by any law or regulation, government official or other third party, including any card association or other payment network. Disclosures may also be made pursuant to any subpoena, court order or other legal process or requirement applicable to us or any Alipay Group company (including “know your customer”, anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing reporting requirements or other commercial disputes);
(11) making disclosures to third parties including relevant regulators to prevent any harm or financial loss, to report suspected illegal activity or to establish, exercise or defend claims or potential claims on behalf of ourselves or any Alipay Group company; or to enable any due diligence and other appraisals or evaluations for any actual or proposed merger, acquisition, financing transaction or joint venture.
(12) conducting research and analysis, or otherwise using data to improve, optimize and expand the product functions of the Alipay Wallet and Alipay Wallet Services, if applicable, to develop related products and services;
(13) managing our business including to protect Users, prevent harm, fraud or theft to ourselves and others, maintain the security of our products, and protect our rights or property and those of others; and
(14) otherwise for everyday business purposes, to comply with law, or in other ways for which we provide specific notice at the time of collection.
4. WITH WHOM DO WE SHARE YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We share your personal information to operate and manage our business, including for the purposes indicated under How We Use Your Personal Information. For example, we may share your information with:
· merchants to whom payments are made using the Alipay Wallet;
· companies in the Alipay Groupproviding services on our behalf or to which we provide services;
· third parties including:
· any agent, contractor or third party service provider that we work with in providing Alipay Wallet Services. For example, we work with third parties to help us with fraud prevention, anti-money laundering checks, credit checking, bill collection, data entry, database management, promotions, marketing, customer service, technology services, products and services alerts, payment settlement and processing and payment extension services;
· entities with whom Alipay maintain commercial arrangements, including online and offline merchants and companies in the Alibaba Group;
· banks, card associations, payment networks or acquiring institutions, and other, including those involved in processing of payments and conducting of transactions through Alipay Wallet Services; and
· law enforcement agencies, insurers, government and regulatory authorities or any other organizations to which Alipay, or any Alipay Group company or third party service provider is under an obligation to make disclosure under the requirements of any applicable law, regulation or commercial arrangement;
· individuals and entities involved in any merger, acquisition, corporate reorganization or financing, or similar transaction with us, including in the event of the sale of all or part of our assets; and
· our own and others’ professional advisors (e.g., lawyers, accountants, auditors and trustees).
See How do we store and protect your personal information?for informationon how we keep your personal information secure when sharing it with others.
5. HOW DO WE STORE AND PROTECT YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We will keep your personal information in accordance with our policies and for as long as it is necessary to provide you with the Alipay Wallet Services or other purposes as set out in this notice. In addition, we may retain your personal information for a longer period (including after you are no longer a User), if it is necessary to comply with laws and regulations applicable to us.
We use a variety of security measures and technologies designed to help protect your personal information from unauthorised access, use, disclosure, alteration or destruction consistent with applicable data protection and privacy laws and regulations. You are responsible for maintaining the security of your account information (username, password, etc.) for Alipay Wallet Services in your possession or control.
For registered users of the Alipay Wallet, your registration and account information (if any) can be viewed and edited in the AliExpress App through your account with us, which is protected by a password. We recommend that you do not divulge your password to anyone. Our staff will never ask you for your password in an unsolicited phone call or in an unsolicited email. If you share a device with others, you should not choose to save your log-in information for the Alipay Wallet (e.g., user ID and password) on that shared device.
6. HOW DO WE PROCESS PERSONAL INFORMATION ABOUT CHILDREN?
Our service is not directed towards children under 13 years old nor does Alipay knowingly collect information from children under 13. If you are under 13, please do not use Alipay Wallet Servicesor submit any personal information to us.
If you are above 13 but below 16 years old, and where we have asked for your consent for collecting your information in order to provide services to you, you must ask your parents or guardian to read this Notice, and use our services or provide us with your information with prior express consent from your parents or guardian. If your guardian disagrees to your use of our services or provision of information to us in accordance with this Notice, please cease immediately the use of our services and notify us promptly so that we can take appropriate actions.
If you, acting as a guardian of a child, have relevant questions in respect of a child’s personal information, please contact us using the details set out in the Contact us section below.
7. THIRD PARTY SERVICES AND SITES
The Alipay Wallet services, the AliExpress App and our website may provide links to other websites, apps and services (including other online merchant sites) for your convenience and information. These services, apps and websites may operate independently from us. Linked services, apps and websites may have their own privacy notices or policies, which we strongly suggest you review if you visit any linked websites. To the extent any linked websites you visit are not owned or controlled by us, we are not responsible for these websites’, apps’ or services’ content, any use of these services, apps or websites by you, or the privacy practices of these services, apps or websites.
8. CHANGES TO THIS NOTICE
We may change, amend or revise this Notice from time to time. We will notify you of any substantive or material change in this Notice by updating this web page, sending push notifications, e-mails or letters, by phone or by publishing announcements on our website.
You can review this Notice on our website (https://render.alipay.com/p/f/agreementpages/alipaywalletprivacypolicy_en.html).
9. CONTACT US
If you have questions or requests about the privacy issues relating to the processing of your personal information, you can contact the privacy office of your data controller, Alipay (Europe) Limited S.A., by email at
AlipayWalletprivacy@alipay.com
or at our business address: Privacy Matters, 11-13, Boulevard de la Foire, L – 1528, Luxembourg. Please provide us with your email address and the merchant and/or transaction (if applicable) that your query is related to. As required under applicable law, please note that we may take steps to ask you to provide further information to verify your identity before granting you access to information or acting on your request to exercise your rights.
10. WHAT IS OUR LEGAL BASIS FOR USING YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
We use your personal information on bases set out below.
· For the performance of
Alipay Wallet Services Agreement
or other contracts to which you are a party.
· To comply with legal and regulatory obligations.
· For legitimate business purposes.
· Using your personal information helps us to operate and improve our business and minimise any disruption to the Alipay Wallet Services that we may offer to you. It also allows us to make our communications with you more relevant and personalised to you, and to make your experience of our products and services efficient and effective.
· As we have infrastructures in China, Singapore and the US, we need to transfer your personal information internationally as part of our business structure, including as a result of laws and regulations applicable to us and other Alipay Group companies and legal claims or proceedings that involve us or other Alipay Group companies.
· However, in cases in which we wish to use your data for our legitimate business purposes, we carefully consider the position and do not go ahead if we think your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms relating to your personal information would be prejudiced. Examples of matters we consider include how we use your data responsibly (for instance security measures we put in place to protect it, such as access controls).
· Because you have given your consent. At times we may ask for your consent or the consent of the holder of parental responsibility over you (in case you are below the age of 16 years, please see How do we process personal information about children? below) to allow us to use your personal information for one or more purposes. See Your rights with respect to your personal information for information about the rights that you have if we process your information on the basis of your consent.
11. TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION OUTSIDE OF THE EEA
Your personal information may be processed by us, companies in the Alipay Group and our trusted third party suppliers outside of the European Economic Area (EEA), including in countries where data protection and privacy laws or regulations may not be equivalent to, or as protective as, the data protection and privacy laws and regulations in the EEA.
These countries include, among others:
· China;
· Singapore; and
· the United States.
In accordance with applicable data protection and privacy laws and regulations, we will implement appropriate measures to ensure that your personal information remains protected and secure when it is transferred outside of the EEA to a jurisdiction other than one that is recognised by the European Commission has having an adequate level of protection of personal data. These measures include (where applicable) transferring pursuant to data transfer agreements implementing standard data protection clauses. You can find information about these measures
here
. If you would like further information, you can contact us at the details set out in the Contact us section below.
We may also transfer your personal information outside of the EEA as permitted by applicable data protection and privacy laws and regulations. Examples include where we need to transfer your personal information: (a) to perform a contract with you (or to take steps before the contract at your request); (b) perform a contract in your interests; or (c) in relation to legal claims.
12. YOUR RIGHTS WITH RESPECT TO YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION
In accordance with applicable data protection and privacy laws and regulations, you may be entitled to:
· ask us about the processing of your personal information, including to be provided with a copy of your personal information;
· request the correction and/or (in some cases) deletion of your personal information;
· in some cases, request the restriction of the processing of your personal information, or object to that processing;
· withdraw your consent to the processing of your personal information (where Alipay is processing your personal information based on your consent);
· request receipt or transmission to another organisation, in a machine-readable form, of the personal information that you have provided to Alipay where we are using your personal information based on consent or performance of a contract; and
· complain to the relevant supervisory authority if your privacy rights are violated, or if you have suffered as a result of unlawful processing of your personal information.
Where you are given the option to share your personal information with us, you can always choose not to do so. If we have requested your consent to processing and you later choose to withdraw it, we will respect that choice in accordance with our legal obligations.
However, choosing not to share your personal information with us or withdrawing your consent to our use of it could mean that we are unable to perform the actions necessary to achieve the purposes of processing described (see
If you would like to exercise your rights, please contact us using the details set out in the Contact us section above .
Sub-policy 3
https://policies.google.cn/privacy:
隐私权和条款
概述
隐私权政策
服务条款
技术
常见问题解答
Google 帐户
隐私权政策
简介
Google 收集的信息
Google 为什么要收集数据
您的隐私控制项
分享您的信息
确保您的信息安全无虞
导出和删除您的信息
保留您的信息
遵守监管机构的规定并与之合作
欧洲的要求
关于本政策
相关隐私权规范
数据传输框架
关键词
合作伙伴
更新
Google 隐私权政策
您使用 Google 服务，即表示您信赖我们对您的信息的处理方式。我们深知这项责任事关重大，因此一直致力于保护您的信息，并让您拥有控制权。
本隐私权政策旨在协助您了解我们会收集哪些信息、为什么收集这些信息，以及您如何更新、管理、导出和删除自己的信息。
如果欧盟或英国的数据保护法适用于对您的信息进行的处理，您可以查看下文的
“欧洲的要求”部分
，详细了解自己的权利及 Google 对这些法律的遵从情况。
隐私设置检查
想更改您的隐私设置？
进行隐私设置检查
生效日期：2024年9月16日
|
归档版本
|
下载 PDF 文件
目录
简介
Google 收集的信息
Google 为什么要收集数据
您的隐私控制项
分享您的信息
确保您的信息安全无虞
导出和删除您的信息
保留您的信息
遵守监管机构的规定并与之合作
欧洲的要求
关于本政策
相关隐私权规范
我们致力于打造各种各样的服务，以便每天协助千百万用户以全新方式探索世界并与这个世界互动。Google 服务包括：
Google 应用、网站和设备，例如 Google 搜索、YouTube 和 Google Home
平台，例如 Chrome 浏览器和 Android 操作系统
集成到第三方应用和网站的产品，例如广告、分析服务和嵌入式 Google 地图
您可以通过多种方式使用 Google 服务来管理自己的隐私。例如，如果您想创建和管理电子邮件与照片等内容，或想看到更合乎需求的搜索结果，可以注册 Google 账号。即使您未登录账号或者根本没有创建账号，也可以使用多种 Google 服务，例如在 Google 中进行搜索，或观看 YouTube 视频。您还可以选择以无痕模式浏览网页，例如使用
Chrome 无痕模式
进行浏览。此类模式有助于防止使用您设备的其他人员得知您的浏览活动。在我们的所有服务中，您都可以通过调整隐私设置，控制我们是否收集某些类型的数据以及我们如何使用这些数据。
为了便于尽可能清晰地解释相关内容，我们添加了示例、介绍性视频和
关键术语
的定义。如果您对本隐私权政策有任何疑问，可以
与我们联系
。
Google 收集的信息
我们希望您了解我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集哪些类型的信息
我们收集信息是为了向所有用户提供更好的服务 - 我们将根据所收集的信息推断所需的基本内容（例如您讲哪种语言）和更为复杂的内容（例如
您觉得哪些广告最有用
、
在网上哪些人对您来说最重要
，或您可能喜欢哪些 YouTube 视频）。Google 收集哪些信息以及如何使用这些信息取决于您如何使用 Google 服务以及如何管理您的隐私控制项。
如果您未登录 Google 帐号，我们会借助与您使用的浏览器、应用或
设备
绑定的
唯一标识符
来存储收集的信息。这样一来，我们就可以在浏览会话间保留您的偏好以及执行一些其他措施，例如保留您的首选语言或确定是否根据您的活动记录向您显示更相关的搜索结果或广告。
如果您登录了自己的帐号，我们还会收集存储在您 Google 帐号名下的信息（我们会将这些信息视为
个人信息
）。
您创建或提供给我们的内容
创建 Google 帐号时，您需要向我们提供
个人信息
，其中包括您的姓名和密码。您还可以选择在自己的帐号中添加
电话号码
或
付款信息
。即使您未登录 Google 帐号，也可以选择向我们提供相关信息，例如，用于与 Google 联系或接收 Google 服务最新动态的电子邮件地址。
我们还会收集您在使用 Google 服务时创建、上传或从其他人处收到的内容，包括您撰写和收到的电子邮件、您保存的照片和视频、您创建的文档和电子表格，以及您对 YouTube 视频的评论。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
您的应用、浏览器和设备信息
我们会收集您访问 Google 服务时使用的应用、浏览器和
设备
的相关信息，以便提供一些实用功能，例如自动产品更新、电量不足时调暗屏幕，等等。
我们收集的信息包括
唯一标识符
、浏览器类型和设置、设备类型和设置、操作系统、移动网络信息（包括运营商名称和电话号码）以及应用版本号。我们还会收集您的应用、浏览器和设备同 Google 服务进行互动的相关信息，包括
IP 地址
、崩溃报告、系统活动以及相应请求的日期、时间和引荐来源网址。
当您设备上的 Google 服务与我们的服务器通信时（例如，当您安装来自 Play 商店的应用时，或当服务查看是否有自动更新时），我们会收集这些信息。如果您使用的是
安装了 Google 应用的 Android 设备
，那么您的设备会定期与 Google 服务器通信，以提供与您的设备以及与 Google 服务的连接相关的信息。这些信息包括您的
设备类型和运营商名称
、崩溃报告、您已安装的应用，以及
关于您如何使用 Android 设备的其他信息
（具体取决于您的设备设置）。
您的活动
我们会收集您在 Google 服务中的活动信息，并会利用这些信息做一些事情，例如推荐您可能喜欢的 YouTube 视频。我们收集的活动信息可能包括：
您搜索的字词
您观看的视频
浏览内容和广告的次数以及与它们互动的次数
语音和音频信息
购买活动
您的交流对象或您分享内容的对象
在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动
已
与您的 Google 帐号同步
的 Chrome 浏览记录
如果您
使用我们的服务接打电话或收发消息
，我们可能会收集通话和消息记录信息，例如您的电话号码、主叫方号码、接收方号码、转接号码、发送方和接收方的电子邮件地址、通话和收发消息的时间和日期、通话时长、路由信息，以及通话和消息的类型与数量。
您可以在自己的 Google 帐号中查找和管理保存在您帐号名下的活动信息。
转到 Google 帐号
您的位置信息
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集您的位置信息，以便提供一些实用功能，例如行车路线、关于您周围事物的搜索结果，以及根据您的位置投放广告等等。
Google 可能会使用不同类型的位置信息来提升您使用的某些服务和产品的实用程度，具体取决于您所用的产品和所选的设置。这些位置信息包括：
GPS 和
来自您设备的其他传感器数据
IP 地址
Google 服务中的活动记录
，例如您的搜索记录或
您标记的地点（例如家庭住址或工作地址）
您的设备周边事物（例如，Wi-Fi 接入点、基站和启用了蓝牙的设备）的相关信息
我们会收集哪些类型的位置数据以及存储这些数据的时间期限在一定程度上取决于您的设备和帐号设置。例如，您可以使用 Android 设备的设置应用
开启或关闭设备的位置信息功能
。如果您想要根据您携带已登录设备去过的地点创建一份私人地图，那么还可以开启
位置记录
功能。 如果您已启用“网络与应用活动记录”设置，那么您的搜索记录和在 Google 服务中的其他活动记录（可能还包括位置信息）会保存到您的 Google 帐号中。详细了解
Google 如何使用位置信息
。
在某些情况下，Google 还会通过
可公开访问的来源
收集您的相关信息。例如，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上，那么 Google 的搜索引擎可能会将相应报道编入索引，并会在其他用户搜索您的姓名时显示相应报道。我们可能还会从可信的合作伙伴处收集您的相关信息，此类合作伙伴包括：目录服务合作伙伴（他们会向我们提供一些要在 Google 服务中显示的商家信息）、营销合作伙伴（他们会向我们提供 Google 业务服务的潜在客户信息），以及安全保护合作伙伴（他们会向我们提供相关信息以便我们
防范滥用行为
）。我们还会收到来自广告合作伙伴的信息，以
代表他们提供广告和研究服务
。
我们会利用各种技术收集和存储信息，包括
Cookie
、
像素代码
、本地存储（例如
使用浏览器进行网络存储
或
应用数据缓存
）、数据库和
服务器日志
。
Google 为什么要收集数据
我们会利用数据打造更好的服务
我们会将从所有 Google 服务中收集的信息用于以下用途：
提供 Google 服务
我们会利用您的信息来
提供 Google 服务
，例如处理您搜索的字词以便返回相关结果，或根据您的通讯录建议收件人以协助您分享内容。
维护和改进 Google 服务
我们还会利用您的信息来
确保 Google 服务正常运行
，例如跟踪中断情况或排查您向我们报告的问题。此外，我们还会利用您的信息来
改进
Google 服务，例如，了解哪些搜索字词最常拼错有助于我们改进所有 Google 服务中使用的拼写检查功能。
开发新服务
我们会利用在现有服务中收集的信息来协助开发新服务。例如，通过了解用户在 Picasa（Google 的首款照片应用）中组织整理照片的方式，我们设计并推出了 Google 照片。
提供个性化服务，包括内容和广告
我们会利用收集的信息为您定制 Google 服务，包括推荐内容，以及提供个性化内容和
定制的搜索结果
。例如，
安全检查
功能会根据您使用 Google 产品的情况向您提供安全提示。此外，Google Play 可以根据您已安装的应用、您在 YouTube 上观看过的视频等信息来推荐您可能会喜欢的新应用，具体取决于您的设置。
我们可能还会根据您的兴趣以及您在各项 Google 服务中的活动，向您展示
个性化广告
，具体取决于您的设置。例如，如果您搜索“山地自行车”，可能会在 YouTube 上看到运动装备广告。您可前往
我的广告中心
内的广告设置中控制 Google 可以利用哪些信息向您展示广告。
我们不会根据
敏感类别
（例如种族、宗教、性取向或健康状况）向您展示个性化广告。
我们不会根据您在 Google 云端硬盘、Gmail 和 Google 相册中的内容向您展示个性化广告。
我们不会与广告主分享可用于识别您个人身份的信息，例如您的姓名或电子邮件地址（除非您要求我们这样做）。例如，如果您看到附近花店的广告并选择“点按通话”按钮，我们会为您接通电话，并且可能会与花店分享您的电话号码。
前往“我的广告中心”
评估效果
我们会利用数据进行分析和评估，以便了解 Google 服务的使用情况。例如，我们会分析与您访问 Google 网站相关的数据，分析结果可用于优化产品设计之类的用途。我们还会利用您与之互动的广告的相关数据（包括您的相关 Google 搜索活动记录）来协助广告主了解其广告系列的效果。我们会利用 Google Analytics（分析）等多种工具来执行此操作。当您访问或运行使用 Google Analytics（分析）的网站或应用时，Google Analytics（分析）用户可能会将您在相应网站或应用中的活动信息与您在其他使用 Google 广告服务的网站或应用中的活动
关联
起来。
与您沟通
我们会利用收集的信息（例如您的电子邮件地址）直接与您互动。例如，如果我们检测到可疑活动（例如尝试从不同于平常的位置登录您的 Google 帐号），则可能会向您发送通知。或者，我们可能会让您了解 Google 服务即将发生的变化或即将进行的改进。此外，当您与 Google 联系时，我们会保存您的请求记录，以便解决您可能遇到的任何问题。
保护 Google、我们的用户和公众
我们会利用信息来协助提升 Google 服务的
安全性和可靠性
。这包括检测、防范和应对可能会危害 Google、我们的用户或
公众
的欺诈行为、滥用行为、安全风险和技术问题。
为了将您的信息用于上述用途，我们会利用不同的技术处理信息。例如：利用自动化系统分析您的内容，以便为您提供定制的搜索结果、个性化广告、根据您使用 Google 服务的情况量身定制的其他功能，等等；分析您的内容，以便
检测滥用行为
，例如垃圾邮件、恶意软件和非法内容；利用
算法
识别数据中的模式，比如 Google 翻译可以检测您请求翻译的短语的常用语言模式，从而协助用户使用各种语言进行沟通交流。
我们可能会
将在各项 Google 服务中以及您的所有设备中收集的信息用于
上述用途。例如，如果您在 YouTube 上观看吉他演奏者的视频，那么在您访问使用 Google 广告产品的网站时，可能会看到吉他课程广告，具体取决于您的设置。我们可能会将
您在其他网站和应用中的活动
与您的个人信息相关联，以改进 Google 服务和 Google 投放的广告，具体取决于您的账号设置。
如果有其他用户已知道您的电子邮件地址或其他能够识别您身份的信息，我们可能会向他们显示您的 Google 帐号公开信息，例如您的姓名和照片。这有很多好处，比如有助于用户识别来自您的电子邮件。
在将您的信息用于本隐私权政策未涵盖的用途时，我们会事先征求您的同意。
您的隐私控制项
您可以选择我们可以收集哪些信息以及如何利用这些信息
此部分介绍了一些关键控制项，您可以通过这些控制项掌控您在 Google 服务中的隐私。您也可以在
隐私设置检查
部分查看和调整重要的隐私设置。除了这些工具之外，我们还在各种产品中提供特定的隐私设置（要了解详情，请参阅我们的
产品隐私设置指南
）。
转到“隐私设置检查”部分
管理、查看和更新您的信息
登录帐号后，您可以随时访问所使用的服务，以便查看和更新信息。例如，Google 照片和云端硬盘都能够帮助您管理保存在 Google 帐号名下的特定类型的内容。
我们还开设了一个专区，以便您查看和控制保存在 Google 帐号名下的信息。您的
Google 帐号
包含：
隐私控制项
活动控件
确定您想要将哪些类型的活动记录保存在自己帐号名下。 例如，如果您开启了 YouTube 历史记录功能，那么您观看的视频和搜索的内容会保存在您的帐号中，以便您获得更好的建议并记住上次观看的位置。如果您开启了“网络与应用活动记录”，那么您的搜索记录和在其他 Google 服务中的活动记录将保存在您的帐号中，以便您获得更加个性化的体验，例如更快的搜索速度和更实用的应用及内容建议。“网络与应用活动记录”还有一项子设置，使您能够控制
您在使用 Google 服务的其他网站、应用和设备上的活动记录相关信息
（例如您在 Android 设备上安装和使用的应用）是否保存到您的 Google 帐号中，并用于改进 Google 服务。
转到“活动控件”
广告设置
管理相应的偏好设置，以决定 Google 及
与 Google 合作
展示广告的网站和应用向您展示什么样的广告。您可以修改自己的兴趣，选择是否允许我们利用您的个人信息向您展示更合乎您需求的广告，以及开启或关闭特定广告服务。
前往“我的广告中心”
关于您
管理您的 Google 帐号中的个人信息，同时控制哪些人可以在各项 Google 服务中看到这些信息。
前往“关于您”部分
分享的认可
选择当广告中出现您的活动（例如评论和推荐）时，旁边是否显示您的姓名和照片。
前往“分享的认可”部分
使用 Google 服务的网站和应用
管理当您访问使用 Google Analytics（分析）等 Google 服务的网站和应用或与之互动时，这些网站和应用可能会与 Google 分享的信息。
转到 Google 如何利用从使用 Google 服务的网站和应用中收集的信息
查看和更新您的信息的方法
我的活动记录
在“我的活动记录”部分，您可以查看和掌控系统在您登录和使用 Google 服务时保存到您的 Google 帐号的数据（例如，您进行过的搜索或您对 Google Play 的访问）。您可以按日期或主题进行浏览，并可以删除部分或全部活动记录。
转到“我的活动记录”部分
Google 信息中心
在 Google 信息中心内，您可以管理与特定产品关联的信息。
转到信息中心
您的个人信息
管理您的联系信息，例如您的姓名、电子邮件地址和电话号码。
转到“个人信息”部分
即使您未登录帐号，也可以管理与您的浏览器或设备关联的信息，包括：
在未登录帐号时的搜索个性化设置：
选择
是否允许 Google 利用您的搜索活动记录提供更合乎您需求的搜索结果和推荐。
YouTube 设置： 暂停和删除您的
YouTube 搜索记录
和
YouTube 观看记录
。
广告设置：
管理
相应的偏好设置，以决定 Google 及与 Google 合作展示广告的网站和应用向您展示什么样的广告。
导出、移除和删除您的信息
如果您想备份 Google 帐号名下的内容或将其用于非 Google 服务，可以导出这些内容的副本。
导出您的数据
要删除您的信息，您可以：
从
特定 Google 服务
中删除您的内容
在
我的活动记录
部分搜索您帐号名下的特定内容，然后将其从您的帐号中删除
删除特定 Google 产品
，包括与这些产品关联的个人信息
删除整个 Google 帐号
删除您的信息
您可以利用
闲置帐号管理员
授权其他人访问您的 Google 帐号的某些部分，以防您无法使用自己帐号的意外情况。
最后，您还可以根据适用的法律和我们的政策
请求从特定 Google 服务中移除内容
。
您还可以通过其他方式来控制 Google 收集的信息（无论您是否已登录 Google 帐号），包括：
浏览器设置： 例如，您可以将浏览器配置为当 Google 在其中设置
Cookie
时显示提示。您也可以将浏览器配置为阻止来自特定网域或所有网域的所有 Cookie。不过请注意，Google 服务
需要使用 Cookie 才能正常执行
某些功能，例如记住您的语言偏好。
设备级设置： 您的设备可能有一些用于确定我们可以收集哪些信息的控制项。例如，在 Android 设备上，您可以
修改位置信息设置
。
分享您的信息
您分享自己的信息时
我们的很多服务都允许您与其他人分享信息，并且您可以控制分享方式。例如，您可以在 YouTube 上公开分享视频，也可以将视频设为私享。请注意，如果您公开分享信息，其他人或许能够通过搜索引擎（包括 Google 搜索）获取您的内容。
在登录帐号后，如果您与某些 Google 服务互动（例如对 YouTube 视频发表评论或评价 Play 中的应用），您的名称和照片将会出现在相应活动旁边。我们可能还会
根据您的“分享的认可”设置在广告中显示这些信息
。
Google 分享您的信息时
我们不会与 Google 以外的公司、组织和个人分享您的个人信息，但以下情况除外：
征得您的同意
在征得您的同意后，我们才会与 Google 以外的其他方分享您的个人信息。例如，如果您
在 Google Home 中通过某项预订服务订餐
，那么在与餐馆分享您的姓名或电话号码之前，我们会先征得您的同意。我们还向您提供了一些控制项，以便您
查看和管理您已授权访问自己 Google 帐号中数据的第三方应用和网站
。在分享您的任何
敏感个人信息
前，我们都会事先征得您的明确同意。
与域管理员分享
如果您是学生或在使用 Google 服务的机构工作，那么负责管理您帐号的
网域管理员
和代理商将能够访问您的 Google 帐号。他们或许能够：
访问和保留存储在您帐号名下的信息，例如您的电子邮件地址
查看关于您帐号的统计信息，例如您安装的应用数量
更改您的帐号密码
暂停或终止您的帐号访问权限
为了满足适用法律、法规、法律程序的规定或强制性的政府要求而接收您的帐号信息
限制您删除或修改您的信息或隐私设置
用于外部处理
我们会向
关联公司
或其他可信商家或个人提供您的个人信息，让他们按照我们的说明、隐私权政策以及任何其他适当的保密和安全措施来为我们处理这些信息。例如，我们会聘请服务提供商来协助我们运营数据中心、交付产品和服务、改进内部业务流程，以及向客户和用户提供其他支持。 我们还会聘请服务提供商协助我们执行以下工作：审核 YouTube 视频内容（目的是保障公共安全）、听取保存的用户音频样本并加以分析（目的是帮助改进 Google 的音频识别技术）。
出于法律原因
如果我们有充分理由相信，出于以下目的确实有必要披露用户的个人信息，我们将会与 Google 以外的其他方分享此类信息：
遵从任何适用的法律、法规、
司法程序或强制性政府要求
。我们会在
透明度报告
中分享从政府收到的要求数量和类型方面的信息。
实施适用的服务条款，包括调查可能存在的违规情况。
检测、防范或解决欺诈、安全或技术问题。
保护 Google、Google
用户
或公众的权利、财产或安全免遭损害。
我们可能会公开分享或与合作伙伴（例如发布商、广告主或权利持有者）分享
非个人身份信息
。例如，我们会公开分享信息，
让公众了解 Google 服务的总体使用趋势
。我们还会允许
特定合作伙伴
出于广告或评估目的使用他们自己的 Cookie 或类似技术从您的浏览器或设备中收集信息。
如果 Google 涉入到资产合并、收购或出售等交易中，我们会继续确保个人信息的机密性，并会在转让个人信息或个人信息受其他隐私权政策约束之前通知受影响的用户。
确保您的信息安全无虞
我们在服务中内置了安全功能，以保护您的信息
所有 Google 产品都内置了强大的安全功能，可以为您的信息持续提供保护。我们会在维护 Google 服务期间获得信息资料，这些信息资料有助于我们检测并自动阻止安全威胁。如果我们检测到我们认为您应知晓的风险，将会通知您并引导您完成一些步骤，以便您受到更好的保护。
我们会努力为您和 Google 提供保护，以防其他人在未经授权的情况下访问、篡改、披露或破坏我们拥有的信息。为此，我们采取了很多措施，其中包括：
使用加密技术来确保您的数据在传输过程中保持私密性
提供多种安全功能（例如
安全浏览
、安全检查和
两步验证
）来协助您保护自己的帐号
审查我们在收集、存储和处理信息方面的做法（包括实体安全措施），以防未经授权的人员访问我们的系统
只允许需要个人信息以对其进行处理的 Google 员工、承包商和代理商访问个人信息。任何拥有此权限的人员都需要遵守合同中规定的严格保密义务，若违反规定，则可能会被处分或被解约。
导出和删除您的信息
您可以随时从 Google 帐号中导出您信息的副本，也可以将其从您的 Google 帐号中删除
如果您想备份 Google 帐号名下的内容或将其用于非 Google 服务，可以导出这些内容的副本。
导出您的数据
要删除您的信息，您可以：
从
特定 Google 服务
中删除您的内容
在
我的活动记录
部分搜索您帐号名下的特定内容，然后将其从您的帐号中删除
删除特定 Google 产品
，包括与这些产品关联的个人信息
删除整个 Google 帐号
删除您的信息
保留您的信息
我们收集到的数据有不同的保留期限，具体取决于相应数据是什么、我们如何使用相应数据以及您如何配置自己的设置：
您可以随时删除某些数据，例如您的
个人信息
或您创建或上传的内容（例如
照片
和
文档
）。您还可以删除在您的帐号中保存的
活动记录信息
，或
选择让系统在规定期限后自动删除这些信息
。我们会将这些数据保留在您的 Google 帐号中，直到您自行将其移除或选择让系统将其移除为止。
我们会在规定期限后自动删除其他数据或对这些数据进行匿名化，例如服务器日志中的
广告数据
。
我们会将部分数据一直保留到您删除自己的 Google 帐号为止，例如与您使用我们服务的频率有关的信息。
并且，我们会出于合法业务的需要或法律目的延长某些数据的保留期限，例如为了确保安全以及防范欺诈与滥用行为，或者为了保留财务记录。
当您删除数据时，我们会按照删除流程确保您的数据已安全彻底地从我们的服务器中移除，或仅以匿名方式保留。我们会尽力确保 Google 服务能够保护信息免遭意外或恶意删除。因此，如果您删除了某些内容，我们可能会过一段时间才会从我们现用的和备用的系统中删除其副本。
您可以详细了解 Google 的
数据保留期限
，包括多久后我们才会删除您的信息。
遵守监管机构的规定并与之合作
我们会定期查看本隐私权政策，确保我们按照符合本政策的方式处理您的信息。
数据传输
我们维护着
遍布世界各地的服务器
，因此，我们处理您的信息时所用的服务器可能并不位于您所在的国家/地区。数据保护法律因国家/地区而异，不同国家/地区的数据保护力度也是有强有弱。无论是在哪里处理您的信息，我们都会一律采用本政策中所述的保护措施。另外，我们还会遵守某些与数据传输有关的
法律框架
。
收到正式的书面投诉后，我们会与投诉方联系。我们会与相应的监管机构（包括当地的数据保护机构）合作，以解决任何与传输您的数据有关且无法由我们和您直接解决的投诉。
欧洲的要求
如何行使您的权利以及如何与 Google 联系
如果欧盟 (EU) 或英国 (UK) 的数据保护法适用于对您的信息进行的处理，我们会提供本政策中所述的
控制措施
，以便您行使请求访问、更新、
移除
和限制处理您信息的权利。此外，您还有权反对处理您的信息，并且有权将您的信息导出到其他服务。
如果在自己的权利方面有其他疑问或请求，
您可以与 Google 以及我们的数据保护办公室联系
。此外，如果您对根据当地法律的规定所享有的权利存有疑问，可以与当地的数据保护机构联系。
数据控制方
除非各项服务专门的隐私权声明中另有说明，否则
负责处理您的信息的数据控制方
取决于您位于哪个国家/地区：
如果您是位于欧洲经济区或瑞士的 Google 服务用户，则数据控制方为 Google Ireland Limited，地址为：Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland。
如果您是位于英国的 Google 服务用户，则数据控制方为 Google LLC，地址为：1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA。
Google LLC 是负责处理已编入索引并显示在
Google 搜索
和 Google 地图等服务中的信息的数据控制方（无论用户身在何处）。Google Ireland Limited 是负责处理信息的数据控制方，所处理的信息将用于训练 Google 的 AI 模型，以便将这些模型部署到 Google Ireland Limited 在欧洲经济区或瑞士提供的服务中。
处理信息时的法律依据
我们会根据以下法律依据处理您的信息，以便用于本政策中所述的
用途
：
我们会处理您的数据，以根据合同提供您要求的服务。
我们会为了自身以及
第三方
的合法权益而处理您的数据，同时会采用
恰当的保护措施
来保护您的隐私。
我们会在必要时处理您的数据，以保护您或他人的重大权益。
我们会在有相应法律义务时处理您的数据。
我们会在出于特定用途处理您的数据之前征求您的同意，您有权随时撤销同意。
您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的隐私设置将决定我们会处理哪些数据、处理这些数据的目的以及处理数据的法律依据。下表更详细地说明了处理这些数据的目的、处理的数据类型以及处理数据的法律依据。
我们处理数据的原因和方式
处理的数据
法律依据
为了提供 Google 服务、产品和功能
数据处理活动的示例：
我们会处理您搜索的字词以便返回结果。
我们会利用您的设备获配的 IP 地址向您发送您请求的数据，例如加载 YouTube 视频。
我们会利用您设备上的 Cookie 中存储的唯一标识符帮助验证您的身份，以确认您是否确实是有权访问您 Google 账号的人。
我们会利用您上传到 Google 相册中的照片和视频帮助您创建可分享的影集、拼图和其他创作内容。
当您向 Google 购买服务或实体商品时，我们会将您的送货地址或配送说明用于诸多用途，比如：处理、履行和配送订单，以及提供与您所购产品或服务相关的支持。
我们会在您购买额外的 Google 云端硬盘存储空间时处理您的付款信息。
我们可以使用您在 Google 产品中互动过的人员的联系信息（例如姓名和电子邮件地址），这样当您想在其他 Google 服务（例如 Gmail、Google 相册和 Google 助理）中与这些人员分享内容和沟通交流时，便能更轻松地找到他们。
我们可能会利用您收到的航班确认电子邮件在 Gmail 中为您创建“办登机手续”按钮。
Google 还会通过可公开访问的来源收集您的相关信息。例如，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上，那么 Google 的搜索引擎可能会将相应报道编入索引，并会在其他用户搜索您的姓名时显示相应报道。或者，如果您的商家信息出现在网站上，我们可能会将这些信息编入索引并将其显示在 Google 服务中。
我们可帮助您使用
Google 位置信息分享
功能分享您的位置信息，以便他人在地图上找到您或知晓您的预计到达时间。
如
分享您的信息
部分中所述，在征得您的同意后，我们才会与 Google 以外的其他方分享您的个人信息；我们还向您提供了一些控件，以便您
查看和管理有权访问您 Google 账号中数据的第三方应用和网站
。
处理的信息将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但可能包括以下内容/信息：
您创建或向我们提供的内容
：
您创建、上传或接收的内容（例如照片、视频、电子邮件、文档和电子表格）。
Google 信息中心
让您能够管理与特定产品关联的信息。
您在创建 Google 账号时向我们提供的个人信息（例如您的
姓名
和密码、
电话号码
、出生日期或
付款信息
）。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
：
您的应用、浏览器和设备的相关信息
，例如您当前使用的浏览器、应用或设备所绑定的
唯一标识符
；以及您所用应用、浏览器和设备与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关信息（比如 IP 地址、崩溃报告和系统活动）。
您在 Google 服务中的活动信息
，例如您的搜索字词、已同步到您 Google 账号中的 Chrome 浏览记录、您查看内容和广告的情况及与它们之间的互动情况，以及您在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动记录。您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制存储在您的 Google 账号中的活动数据。
位置信息
，例如可根据 GPS、IP 地址以及您设备上或设备周围传感器中的其他数据确定的位置信息，在一定程度上取决于您的设备和账号设置。
来自可公开访问的来源的信息
，例如可在网络上公开访问的信息（比方说，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上的一篇报道中）或来自其他公开来源的信息。
来自我们信任的合作伙伴的信息
，例如来自以下来源的信息：向我们提供商家信息，以便在Google 服务中显示的目录服务合作伙伴，或者向我们提供相关信息，以便我们防范滥用行为的安保合作伙伴。
处理这些信息的法律依据将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但也可能包括以下情况：
为了
履行与您之间的合同
，例如加载 YouTube 视频或在您向 Google 购买服务或实体商品时处理、履行和配送您的订单。
为了保障我们自身以及
第三方
的合法权益，而有必要处理信息的情况，包括：
提供、维护和改进服务以满足 Google 用户的需求
。比方说，使用您在 Google 产品中互动过的人员的联系信息（例如姓名和电子邮件地址），这样当您想在其他 Google 服务（例如 Gmail、Google 相册和 Google 助理）中与这些人员分享内容和沟通交流时，便能更轻松地找到他们。
在征得您
同意
的情况下，例如当您选择了与 Google 位置信息分享功能分享位置信息时。
为了维护和改进 Google 服务、产品和功能
为了维护服务以使其按预期运行，例如调试服务、跟踪问题或排查问题。
数据处理活动的示例：
我们会持续监控系统以检测是否出现问题。如果发现特定功能存在问题，通过查看在问题出现之前收集的活动信息，我们会更快地解决问题。
我们会记录用户与 Google 地图、Google 搜索等应用内的按钮互动的情况，以便了解按钮能否按预期发挥作用。
为了改进 Google 服务并帮助提升这些服务的安全性和可靠性，例如检测、防范和应对可能会对服务或用户造成危害的欺诈行为、滥用行为、安全风险和技术问题。
数据处理活动的示例：
我们会分析您与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关数据，以便打造更好的产品。例如，分析结果可能有助于我们发现用户花费了太长时间来完成某项任务或者根本无法完成所有步骤。然后，我们就可以针对所有用户重新设计相应功能并改进产品。
我们会分析哪些搜索字词最常拼错，以便改进各项 Google 服务中采用的拼写检查功能。
我们会分析Google 翻译的使用情况，以便提高翻译质量并增加Google 翻译支持的语言。
我们会分析 Google 购物上的查询，以确定哪些商品、商家和品牌与不同类型的查询相关。
Google Chrome 的安全浏览功能可在用户的浏览器和 Google 的服务器之间发送关于可疑网站的信息，以帮助防范钓鱼式攻击、恶意软件和恶意广告等。
处理的信息将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但可能包括以下内容/信息：
您创建或向我们提供的内容
：
您创建、上传或接收的内容（例如照片、视频、电子邮件、文档和电子表格）。
Google 信息中心
让您能够管理与特定产品关联的信息。
您在创建 Google 账号时向我们提供的个人信息（例如您的
姓名
和密码、
电话号码
、出生日期或
付款信息
）。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
：
您的应用、浏览器和设备的相关信息
，例如您当前使用的浏览器、应用或设备所绑定的
唯一标识符
；以及您所用应用、浏览器和设备与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关信息（比如 IP 地址、崩溃报告和系统活动）。
您在 Google 服务中的活动信息
，例如您的搜索字词、已同步到您 Google 账号中的 Chrome 浏览记录、您查看内容和广告的情况及与它们之间的互动情况，以及您在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动记录。您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制存储在您的 Google 账号中的活动数据。
位置信息
，例如可根据 GPS、IP 地址以及您设备上或设备周围传感器中的其他数据确定的位置信息，在一定程度上取决于您的设备和账号设置。
来自可公开访问的来源的信息
，例如可在网络上公开访问的信息（比方说，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上的一篇报道中）或来自其他公开来源的信息。
来自我们信任的合作伙伴的信息
，例如来自以下来源的信息：向我们提供商家信息，以便在Google 服务中显示的目录服务合作伙伴，或者向我们提供相关信息，以便我们防范滥用行为的安保合作伙伴。
处理这些信息的法律依据将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但也可能包括以下情况：
为了
履行与您之间的合同
，例如使用您与 Google 应用的互动日志来确保这些应用按预期运行。
为了保障我们自身以及
第三方
的合法权益，而有必要处理信息的情况，包括：
提供、维护和改进服务以满足 Google 用户的需求
。例如，分析哪些搜索字词最常拼错，以便改进各项 Google 服务中采用的拼写检查功能。
了解用户如何使用 Google 服务，以确保和改进 Google 服务的性能
。例如，分析Google 翻译的使用情况，以便提高翻译质量并增加Google 翻译支持的语言。
开展研究，以便为用户改进 Google 服务并让公众受益
。例如，提高Google 翻译的翻译质量并增加Google 翻译支持的语言。
为了开发新的 Google 服务、产品和功能
数据处理活动的示例：
通过了解用户如何在 Picasa（Google 的首款照片应用）中整理照片，我们设计并发布了 Google 相册。
通过了解用户观看短内容的情况以及创作者创作短内容的情况，我们成功开发了新的 YouTube 服务。
我们可保存您在与 Google 搜索、Google 助理、Google 地图和 Gboard 等服务进行语音互动时的录音，以便开发和改进 Google 音频技术，具体取决于您的相关设置。
我们会利用网络上的公开信息或来自其他公开来源的信息，帮助训练新的机器学习模型并构建基本技术，以便为各种 Google 产品（例如 Google 翻译、Gemini 应用和 Cloud AI 功能）提供支持。
我们会利用您与 Gemini 应用等 AI 模型/技术之间的互动数据来开发、训练、微调及改进这些模型，以便更好地处理您的请求，更新其分类器和过滤器，确保模型在处理信息时更加安全、理解语言更准确，并提供符合事实的信息。
处理的信息将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但可能包括以下内容/信息：
您创建或向我们提供的内容
：
您创建、上传或接收的内容（例如照片、视频、电子邮件、文档和电子表格）。
Google 信息中心
让您能够管理与特定产品关联的信息。
您在创建 Google 账号时向我们提供的个人信息（例如您的
姓名
和密码、
电话号码
、出生日期或
付款信息
）。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
：
您的应用、浏览器和设备的相关信息
，例如您当前使用的浏览器、应用或设备所绑定的
唯一标识符
；以及您所用应用、浏览器和设备与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关信息（比如 IP 地址、崩溃报告和系统活动）。
您在 Google 服务中的活动信息
，例如您的搜索字词、已同步到您 Google 账号中的 Chrome 浏览记录、您查看内容和广告的情况及与它们之间的互动情况，以及您在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动记录。您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制存储在您的 Google 账号中的活动数据。
位置信息
，例如可根据 GPS、IP 地址以及您设备上或设备周围传感器中的其他数据确定的位置信息，在一定程度上取决于您的设备和账号设置。
来自可公开访问的来源的信息
，例如可在网络上公开访问的信息（比方说，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上的一篇报道中）或来自其他公开来源的信息。
来自我们信任的合作伙伴的信息
，例如来自以下来源的信息：向我们提供商家信息，以便在Google 服务中显示的目录服务合作伙伴，或者向我们提供相关信息，以便我们防范滥用行为的安保合作伙伴。
处理这些信息的法律依据将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但也可能包括以下情况：
为了保障我们自身以及
第三方
的合法权益，而有必要处理信息的情况，包括：
开发对 Google 用户有用的新产品和新功能
。例如，通过了解用户如何在 Picasa（Google 的首款照片应用）中使用照片，我们设计并发布了 Google 相册。或者，利用网络上的公开信息或来自其他公开来源的信息，帮助训练 Google 的 AI 模型并打造使用这些基本技术的产品和功能（比如 Google 翻译、Gemini 应用和 Cloud AI 功能）。
提供、维护和改进服务以满足 Google 用户的需求
。例如，利用您在各项 Google 服务中的活动信息（比如您与 Gemini 应用的互动数据），训练和改进机器学习模型，并更新模型的语言理解功能、安全分类器和安全过滤器。
在征得您的
同意
的情况下，我们会处理您的信息，例如保存与 Google 搜索、Google 助理、Google 地图和 Gboard 进行语音互动时的录音，以便开发和改进 Google 音频技术。
为了提供个性化服务，包括内容和广告
为了给您定制 Google 服务，包括提供推荐内容、个性化内容和定制的搜索结果。
数据处理活动的示例：
Google 的“安全检查”功能会根据您使用 Google 产品的情况提供安全提示。
Google 新闻可能会根据您的大致位置为您提供本地新闻结果。
Google 搜索可能会根据您的大致位置为您提供搜索结果。
Google 助理可按照您的指令（例如“给李华发条短信”）利用您的通讯录发送消息。
Google Play 会利用您已安装的应用、您在 YouTube 上观看过的视频等信息来推荐您可能会喜欢的新应用。
我们可能会在 Google 搜索首页中显示一幅 Google 涂鸦，以庆祝/纪念您所在国家/地区特有的活动/事件。
Google 可根据您正在访问的网站的上下文向您展示广告，例如在您访问园艺技巧方面的网页时向您展示与园艺设备有关的广告。
当您登录自己的 Google 账号并启用“网络与应用活动记录”控件后，Google 会根据您之前的搜索记录以及在其他 Google 服务中的活动向您提供更贴合需求的搜索结果。
为了根据您的兴趣向您展示个性化广告，具体取决于您的相关设置。
数据处理活动的示例：
如果您搜索“山地自行车”或观看山地骑行视频，便可能会在搜索结果中或 YouTube 上看到运动装备广告。
如果您在 YouTube 上观看有关烘焙的视频，便可能会在浏览网页时看到更多关于烘培的广告。
您可能还会看到根据广告主提供的信息投放的个性化广告。例如，如果您曾在某个广告主的网站上购物，则他们可以利用相应访问信息向您展示广告。
处理的信息将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但可能包括以下内容/信息：
您创建或向我们提供的内容
：
您创建、上传或接收的内容（例如照片、视频、电子邮件、文档和电子表格）。
Google 信息中心
让您能够管理与特定产品关联的信息。
您在创建 Google 账号时向我们提供的个人信息（例如您的
姓名
和密码、
电话号码
、出生日期或
付款信息
）。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
：
您的应用、浏览器和设备的相关信息
，例如您当前使用的浏览器、应用或设备所绑定的
唯一标识符
；以及您所用应用、浏览器和设备与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关信息（比如 IP 地址、崩溃报告和系统活动）。
您在 Google 服务中的活动信息
，例如您的搜索字词、已同步到您 Google 账号中的 Chrome 浏览记录、您查看内容和广告的情况及与它们之间的互动情况，以及您在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动记录。您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制存储在您的 Google 账号中的活动数据。
位置信息
，例如可根据 GPS、IP 地址以及您设备上或设备周围传感器中的其他数据确定的位置信息，在一定程度上取决于您的设备和账号设置。
来自可公开访问的来源的信息
，例如可在网络上公开访问的信息（比方说，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上的一篇报道中）或来自其他公开来源的信息。
来自我们信任的合作伙伴的信息
，例如来自以下来源的信息：向我们提供商家信息，以便在Google 服务中显示的目录服务合作伙伴，或者向我们提供相关信息，以便我们防范滥用行为的安保合作伙伴。
处理这些信息的法律依据将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但也可能包括以下情况：
为了
履行与您之间的合同
，例如在 Google 助理按照您的指令（比如“给李华发条短信”）利用您的通讯录发送消息时。
为了保障我们自身以及
第三方
的合法权益，而有必要处理信息的情况，包括：
定制 Google 服务，让您畅享更好的用户体验
。例如，在 Google 搜索首页中显示一幅 Google 涂鸦，以庆祝/纪念您所在国家/地区特有的活动/事件；根据您使用 Google 产品的情况提供安全提示；或者定制与您的年龄相符的体验（如有必要）。
投放广告，这样我们才能向用户免费提供我们的诸多服务
。例如，根据您正在访问的网站的上下文向您展示广告，比如在您访问园艺技巧方面的网页时向您展示与园艺设备有关的广告。（在向您展示个性化广告之前，我们会事先征得您的同意。）
在征得您的
同意
的情况下，我们会处理您的信息，例如：根据您在 YouTube 上观看过的视频在 Google Play 上推荐应用；或者根据您的兴趣向您展示个性化广告，比如当您在 YouTube 上观看有关烘焙的视频后，在您浏览网页时展示关于烘培的广告。
为了衡量效果：我们会使用数据进行分析和衡量，以了解用户对 Google 服务的使用情况。
数据处理活动的示例：
我们会分析您对 Google 网站的访问情况数据，以便将分析结果用于优化产品设计之类的用途。
我们会使用您的广告互动情况数据来帮助广告主了解其广告系列的效果。
我们会利用用户在 Google 地球上最常点击的地点相关的数据，以便了解哪些功能受用户的欢迎，并发现错误。
Google 搜索会统计用户执行特定查询的次数，并了解用户对搜索结果质量的看法，让 Google 搜索更加实用。
Google 翻译会分析翻译次数和某译文被标记为质量不佳的次数，以便发掘有潜力的新功能，并解决用户在使用此服务时遇到的问题。
我们可能会在向合作伙伴（例如内容许可人）支付版税时一并分享非个人身份信息。
处理的信息将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但可能包括以下内容/信息：
您创建或向我们提供的内容
：
您创建、上传或接收的内容（例如照片、视频、电子邮件、文档和电子表格）。
Google 信息中心
让您能够管理与特定产品关联的信息。
您在创建 Google 账号时向我们提供的个人信息（例如您的
姓名
和密码、
电话号码
、出生日期或
付款信息
）。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
：
您的应用、浏览器和设备的相关信息
，例如您当前使用的浏览器、应用或设备所绑定的
唯一标识符
；以及您所用应用、浏览器和设备与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关信息（比如 IP 地址、崩溃报告和系统活动）。
您在 Google 服务中的活动信息
，例如您的搜索字词、已同步到您 Google 账号中的 Chrome 浏览记录、您查看内容和广告的情况及与它们之间的互动情况，以及您在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动记录。您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制存储在您的 Google 账号中的活动数据。
位置信息
，例如可根据 GPS、IP 地址以及您设备上或设备周围传感器中的其他数据确定的位置信息，在一定程度上取决于您的设备和账号设置。
来自可公开访问的来源的信息
，例如可在网络上公开访问的信息（比方说，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上的一篇报道中）或来自其他公开来源的信息。
来自我们信任的合作伙伴的信息
，例如来自以下来源的信息：向我们提供商家信息，以便在Google 服务中显示的目录服务合作伙伴，或者向我们提供相关信息，以便我们防范滥用行为的安保合作伙伴。
处理这些信息的法律依据将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但也可能包括以下情况：
为了保障我们自身以及
第三方
的合法权益，而有必要处理信息的情况，包括：
了解用户如何使用 Google 服务，以确保和改进 Google 服务的性能
。例如，分析Google 翻译的使用情况，以便提高翻译质量并增加Google 翻译支持的语言。
检测、防范或处理 Google 服务中存在的欺诈行为、滥用行为、安全问题或技术问题
。例如，监控用户对 Google 地球的使用方式以便及时发现错误。
提供、维护和改进服务以满足 Google 用户的需求
。例如，分析Google 翻译中某译文被标记为质量不佳的次数，以解决用户在使用此服务时遇到的问题。
开发对 Google 用户有用的新产品和新功能
。例如，分析Google 翻译所完成的翻译次数的相关数据，以便发掘有潜力的新功能。
履行我们对合作伙伴（比如开发者和权利所有者）的义务
。例如，在向内容许可人支付版税时也向其提供相关报告。
为了与您沟通交流：我们会使用收集的信息（例如您的电子邮件地址）直接与您互动。
数据处理活动的示例：
我们可能会在检测到可疑活动（例如有人尝试从异常的位置登录您的 Google 账号）时向您发送通知。
我们可能会将我们的服务即将发生的变化或改进告知您。
如果您联系 Google，我们会保存您的请求记录，这有助于解决您可能会遇到的问题。
Google 相册等 Google 服务可能会向您发送关于其产品优惠（例如照片打印促销活动）的营销资料，具体取决于您的相关设置。
YouTube Premium 和 YouTube Music Premium 等 Google 服务可能会将您的订阅即将发生的变化告知您。
处理的信息将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但可能包括以下内容/信息：
您创建或向我们提供的内容
：
您创建、上传或接收的内容（例如照片、视频、电子邮件、文档和电子表格）。
Google 信息中心
让您能够管理与特定产品关联的信息。
您在创建 Google 账号时向我们提供的个人信息（例如您的
姓名
和密码、
电话号码
、出生日期或
付款信息
）。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
：
您的应用、浏览器和设备的相关信息
，例如您当前使用的浏览器、应用或设备所绑定的
唯一标识符
；以及您所用应用、浏览器和设备与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关信息（比如 IP 地址、崩溃报告和系统活动）。
您在 Google 服务中的活动信息
，例如您的搜索字词、已同步到您 Google 账号中的 Chrome 浏览记录、您查看内容和广告的情况及与它们之间的互动情况，以及您在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动记录。您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制存储在您的 Google 账号中的活动数据。
位置信息
，例如可根据 GPS、IP 地址以及您设备上或设备周围传感器中的其他数据确定的位置信息，在一定程度上取决于您的设备和账号设置。
来自可公开访问的来源的信息
，例如可在网络上公开访问的信息（比方说，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上的一篇报道中）或来自其他公开来源的信息。
来自我们信任的合作伙伴的信息
，例如来自以下来源的信息：向我们提供商家信息，以便在Google 服务中显示的目录服务合作伙伴，或者向我们提供相关信息，以便我们防范滥用行为的安保合作伙伴。
处理这些信息的法律依据将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但也可能包括以下情况：
为了
履行与您之间的合同
，例如当您联系 Google 以获取支持服务或注册接收产品动态资讯时。
为了保障我们自身以及
第三方
的合法权益，而有必要处理信息的情况，包括：
提供、维护和改进服务以满足 Google 用户的需求
。例如，向您发送 Google 服务动态通知（比如将 Google 服务即将发生的变化或改进告知您）。
进行营销宣传，以将 Google 服务动态告知用户
。例如，向 Google 相册用户发送电子邮件，让他们知道有一项照片打印促销活动。
为了保护 Google、Google 用户和公众
为了协助提升 Google 服务的安全性和可靠性，包括检测、防范和应对可能会给 Google、Google 用户或公众造成危害的欺诈行为、滥用行为、安全风险和技术问题。
数据处理活动的示例：
我们会收集并分析 IP 地址及 Cookie 数据以防范自动化滥用行为。此类滥用行为有多种形式，例如向 Gmail 用户发送垃圾邮件、以欺诈性手段点击广告来骗取广告主的钱款，或通过发起分布式拒绝服务 (DDoS) 攻击来阻止用户获取内容。
Gmail 中的“上次帐号活动时间”功能有助于您了解是否有人在您不知情的情况下访问过您的电子邮箱，如果有，则让您了解访问的时间。此功能会显示与 Gmail 中的近期活动有关的信息，例如访问您的邮箱时使用的 IP 地址、相关位置信息，以及访问时间和日期。
我们会分析您的内容以便
检测滥用行为
，例如垃圾内容、恶意软件和非法内容。
我们会在收到希望从 Google 服务中移除内容的要求后，依据 Google 的内容移除政策或适用法律来处理与要求相关的信息，以便既能评估相应要求，又能确保我们的做法公开透明、更负责任，并防范滥用行为和欺诈行为。
为了遵循任何适用的法律、法规、司法程序或强制性政府要求。
数据处理活动的示例：
Google 与其他技术公司和通信公司一样，经常会收到世界各地的政府机构和法院发来的用户数据披露要求。对于您存储在 Google 的数据，我们一向注重保护其隐私和安全，在根据法律要求提供数据时，我们也会将这一点放在首位。我们的法律团队会审核每一项要求（无论其为何种类型），并且我们经常会在相应要求过于宽泛或不符合正确流程时将其驳回。
为了履行法律义务，我们有时必须出于保留财务记录等用途而保留某些信息，比如出于税务或会计方面的用途而保留您向 Google 支付的某笔款项的相关信息。
为了遵守各种法律法规，我们必须采取措施来确认用户已达到可使用 Google 服务的年龄。为帮助确定您的年龄，我们会处理您提供的出生日期信息。我们还会处理您在 Google 服务中的活动信息（无论您是否已登录 Google 账号），并会利用机器学习技术来确定您是否已年满 18 周岁。在某些情况下，如果无法通过其他途径确定您是否已达到可使用 Google 服务的年龄，我们可以要求您提供其他信息来验证年龄，例如由政府签发的身份证件、信用卡、您本人的照片或您的电话号码。
处理的信息将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但可能包括以下内容/信息：
您创建或向我们提供的内容
：
您创建、上传或接收的内容（例如照片、视频、电子邮件、文档和电子表格）。
Google 信息中心
让您能够管理与特定产品关联的信息。
您在创建 Google 账号时向我们提供的个人信息（例如您的
姓名
和密码、
电话号码
、出生日期或
付款信息
）。
我们会在您使用 Google 服务时收集的信息
：
您的应用、浏览器和设备的相关信息
，例如您当前使用的浏览器、应用或设备所绑定的
唯一标识符
；以及您所用应用、浏览器和设备与 Google 服务之间互动情况的相关信息（比如 IP 地址、崩溃报告和系统活动）。
您在 Google 服务中的活动信息
，例如您的搜索字词、已同步到您 Google 账号中的 Chrome 浏览记录、您查看内容和广告的情况及与它们之间的互动情况，以及您在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动记录。您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制存储在您的 Google 账号中的活动数据。
位置信息
，例如可根据 GPS、IP 地址以及您设备上或设备周围传感器中的其他数据确定的位置信息，在一定程度上取决于您的设备和账号设置。
来自可公开访问的来源的信息
，例如可在网络上公开访问的信息（比方说，如果您的姓名出现在当地报纸上的一篇报道中）或来自其他公开来源的信息。
来自我们信任的合作伙伴的信息
，例如来自以下来源的信息：向我们提供商家信息，以便在Google 服务中显示的目录服务合作伙伴，或者向我们提供相关信息，以便我们防范滥用行为的安保合作伙伴。
处理这些信息的法律依据将取决于您对 Google 服务的使用方式和您的相关设置，但也可能包括以下情况：
为了保障我们自身以及
第三方
的合法权益，而有必要处理信息的情况，包括：
履行依法提出的要求，包括调查可能违反适用服务条款的行为
。例如，分析内容以便检测滥用行为，比如垃圾内容、恶意软件和非法内容。
检测、防范或处理 Google 服务中存在的欺诈行为、滥用行为、安全问题或技术问题
。例如，收集并分析 IP 地址和 Cookie 数据以防范自动化滥用行为。
保护 Google、Google 用户或公众的权利、财产或安全免遭损害，包括向政府机关披露信息
。例如，收到司法程序文件或政府和法院强制性的要求后，我们会谨慎审查每项要求，待确认其符合适用的法律规定后，才会按要求披露相关数据。
开展研究，以便为用户改进 Google 服务并让公众受益
。例如，处理与从 Google 服务中
移除内容的要求
相关的信息，目的是让公众知情、为研究提供支持、确保这类要求公开透明。
为了在必要时保护您或他人的
重大权益
。例如，处理数据以检测和打击在线儿童性虐待行为。
为了履行我们的相应
法律义务
，例如出于保留财务记录等用途而保留某些信息，或处理和保留信息以帮助确保用户已达到可使用 Google 服务的年龄。
关联您的 Google 服务
如果您是欧盟境内的用户，Google 会提供相关选项，以便您选择是否让特定 Google 服务保持关联状态。您可以参阅
关于 DMA 以及您名下已关联的服务
，详细了解您已关联的服务以及如何管理您的选择。
关于本政策
本政策适用范围
本隐私权政策适用于由 Google LLC 及其
关联公司
提供的所有服务，包括 YouTube、Android 以及在第三方网站上提供的服务（例如广告服务），不适用于有单独的隐私权政策并且这些政策未纳入本隐私权政策的服务。
本隐私权政策不适用于：
为 Google 服务进行广告宣传的其他公司和组织的信息处理做法
由其他公司或个人提供的服务，包括他们提供的可能包含 Google 服务（适用此隐私权政策）的产品或网站、在搜索结果中向您显示的产品或网站，或者 Google 服务中链接到的产品或网站
本政策的修订
我们会不时修订本隐私权政策。未经您明确同意，我们不会减降您按照本隐私权政策的规定所享有的权利。我们一律会指明最后所做更改的发布日期，并且会提供对
归档版本
的访问权限，以供您查阅。对于重大变更，我们会向您发出郑重通知（包括对于某些服务，我们会通过电子邮件发送通知，说明对隐私权政策进行的更改）。
相关隐私权规范
特定 Google 服务
以下隐私权声明提供了关于某些 Google 服务的其他信息：
Payments
Fiber
Gemini 应用
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube 少儿版
通过 Family Link 为未满 13 周岁（或您所在国家/地区的适用年龄）的儿童管理的 Google 帐号
面向儿童和青少年的 Family Link 隐私权政策指南
从 Google 助理的儿童功能中收集语音和音频
如果您就读的学校或工作的单位使用 Google Workspace 或 Google Cloud Platform，您可以在
Google Cloud 隐私权声明
中了解这些服务如何收集和使用您的个人信息。
其他实用资源
以下链接提供了一些实用资源，有助于您详细了解我们的做法和隐私设置。
您的 Google 帐号
中包含多项可用于管理帐号的设置
隐私设置检查
可引导您对 Google 帐号进行关键的隐私设置
通过
Google 的安全中心
，您可以详细了解我们的内置安全保障功能、隐私保护控制项，以及各种有助于为全家人上网设置数字产品基本使用规则的工具。
Google 的青少年隐私保护指南
解答了我们收到的关于隐私权的部分热门问题
隐私权和条款
提供有关本隐私权政策及 Google 服务条款的更多背景信息
技术
部分包含关于以下内容的更多信息：
Google 如何使用 Cookie
用于
投放广告
的技术
Google 如何利用从使用 Google 服务的网站和应用中收集的信息
关键词
非个人身份信息
记录的与用户相关的信息，但不再反映或涉及用户的个人身份信息。
服务器日志
与大多数网站一样，我们的服务器会自动记录您在访问网站时所发出的网页请求。这些“服务器日志”通常包括您的网络请求、互联网协议地址、浏览器类型、浏览器语言、请求的日期和时间及可以唯一识别您的浏览器的一个或多个 Cookie。
以搜索“cars”为例，典型的日志条目如下所示：
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
是由用户的 ISP 指定给用户的 IP 地址。在用户每次连接到互联网时，服务提供商为其指定的地址都可能会不同，具体取决于用户所使用的服务。
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
是查询日期和时间。
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
是请求访问的网址，其中包含搜索查询字词。
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
是所使用的浏览器和操作系统。
740674ce2123a969
是系统在特定计算机首次访问 Google 时为其指定的唯一 Cookie ID。（用户可以删除 Cookie。如果用户在最后一次访问 Google 后从计算机中删除了相应的 Cookie，则当用户从该设备再次访问 Google 时，系统会为该设备指定这个唯一 Cookie ID。）
个人信息
您向我们提供的个人身份信息，例如您的姓名、电子邮件地址或帐单信息，或 Google 可通过合理方式关联到此类信息的其他数据，例如我们关联到您的 Google 帐号的信息。
关联公司
关联公司是指隶属于 Google 公司集团的实体，包括以下在欧盟地区提供消费者服务的公司：Google Ireland Limited、Google Commerce Ltd、Google Payment Corp 和 Google Dialer Inc。详细了解
在欧盟地区提供商用服务的公司
。
敏感的个人信息
这是一种特殊类别的个人信息，与医疗保密信息、种族或民族背景、政治/宗教信仰或性取向等主题有关。
设备
设备是指可用于访问 Google 服务的计算机。例如桌面设备、平板电脑、智能音响设备和智能手机都可视为设备。
使用浏览器进行网络存储
“使用浏览器进行网络存储”的机制可让网站将数据存储在设备上的浏览器中。如果在“本地存储”模式下使用该机制，则数据可存储在各个会话中。这样一来，即使在关闭并重新打开浏览器后，用户仍可以获取相应数据。有助于实现网络存储的技术之一就是 HTML 5。
算法
计算机在执行解题运算时遵循的流程或一系列规则。
唯一标识符
唯一标识符是一串字符，可用于唯一标识浏览器、应用或设备。不同的标识符在有效期、是否可由用户重置以及获取方式方面会有所不同。
唯一标识符具有多种用途，其中包括检测安全风险和欺诈行为、将服务（例如您的电子邮件收件箱）同步、记录您的偏好以及提供合乎个人需求的广告。例如，根据 Cookie 中存储的唯一标识符，网站可以在浏览器中以您的首选语言显示内容。您可以将浏览器配置为拒绝所有 Cookie 或在网站发送 Cookie 时显示提示。 详细了解
Google 如何使用 Cookie
。
在浏览器以外的其他平台上，唯一标识符可用于识别特定设备或其中的应用。例如，系统可以根据广告 ID 之类的唯一标识符在 Android 设备上提供具有相关性的广告（您可以在设备的设置部分
管理
此类标识符）。设备制造商还可以在设备中编入唯一标识符（有时称为通用唯一 ID 或 UUID），比如手机的 IMEI 号。举例来说，系统可以根据设备的唯一标识符针对设备定制 Google 服务，或分析与 Google 服务相关的设备问题。
像素标签
像素代码是在网站或电子邮件正文中应用的一种技术，用于跟踪特定活动（例如网站的浏览次数或电子邮件的打开时间）。像素代码经常与 Cookie 结合使用。
引荐来源网址
引荐来源网址（统一资源定位地址）是网络浏览器传送至目标网页的信息，通常是在您点击指向相应网页的链接后传送。引荐来源网址包含您在浏览器中最后一次访问的网页的网址。
应用数据缓存
应用数据缓存是指设备上的一种数据存储机制。使用它有很多好处，例如，可让网络应用在未连接互联网的情况下运行，以及可通过提高内容加载速度来改善相关应用的性能。
Cookie
Cookie 是在您访问网站时发送到您计算机上的一种小文件，其中包含一串字符。当您再次访问相应网站时，网站就可通过 Cookie 识别您的浏览器。Cookie 可能会存储用户偏好及其他信息。您可以将浏览器配置为拒绝所有 Cookie 或在网站发送 Cookie 时显示提示。不过，如果没有 Cookie，某些网站功能或服务可能无法正常工作。详细了解
当您使用 Google 合作伙伴的网站或应用时
，
Google 如何使用 Cookie
以及如何使用相关数据（包括 Cookie）。
Google 帐户
只要注册
Google 帐号
并向我们提供一些个人信息（通常是您的姓名、电子邮件地址和密码），您就可以使用我们的某些服务。当您访问 Google 服务时，系统会利用这些帐号信息对您进行身份验证，以防止未经授权的人员访问您的帐号。您可以随时在 Google 帐号设置部分修改或删除帐号。
IP 地址
每台上网的设备都会被指定一个编号，也就是我们所说的互联网协议 (IP) 地址。这些编号通常都是根据地理区域指定的。IP 地址通常可用于识别设备连接至互联网时所在的位置。详细了解
Google 如何使用位置信息
。
其他背景信息
安全性和可靠性
我们会通过多种方式利用您的信息来确保 Google 服务的安全性和可靠性，这些方式包括：
收集和分析 IP 地址及 Cookie 数据，以防止自动化滥用行为。此类滥用行为有多种形式，例如向 Gmail 用户发送垃圾邮件、以欺骗性手段点击广告来骗取广告主的广告费，或通过发起分布式拒绝服务 (DDoS) 攻击来删改内容。
Gmail 中的“上次帐号活动时间”功能有助于您了解是否有人在您不知情的情况下访问过您的电子邮箱，如果有，则让您了解访问的时间。此功能会显示与 Gmail 中的近期活动有关的信息，例如访问您的邮箱时使用的 IP 地址、相关位置信息，以及访问时间和日期。
了解详情
安装了 Google 应用的 Android 设备
安装了 Google 应用的 Android 设备包括由 Google 或我们的某个合作伙伴销售的设备，其中包括手机、相机、车辆、穿戴式设备和电视。这些设备采用了 Google Play 服务和其他预装应用，包括 Gmail、Google 地图、手机上的相机、手机拨号器、文字转语音、键盘输入和安全功能等服务。 详细了解
Google Play 服务
。
遍布世界各地的服务器
例如，我们运营的数据中心遍布
世界各地
，以协助确保我们的产品随时可供用户使用。
代表广告主提供广告和调查服务
例如，商家可以上传来自其会员卡计划的数据，以便在搜索结果或购物结果中包含会员信息，或更好地了解其广告系列的效果。我们只会向广告主提供不包含个人信息的汇总报告。
第三方
例如，我们会处理您的信息，以便向权利持有者提供其内容在 Google 服务中使用情况的统计数据报告。如果有人搜索您的姓名，我们也可能会对您的信息进行处理，并在搜索结果中显示含有您的公开信息的网站。
电话号码
如果您将电话号码添加到自己的帐号中，则该电话号码可在各项 Google 服务中有不同的用途，具体取决于您的设置。例如，您的电话号码可用于帮助您在忘记密码时访问自己的帐号，用来帮助其他人找到您并与您联系，以及向您显示更合乎您的需求的广告。
了解详情
定制 Google 服务
例如，我们可能会在 Google 搜索首页中显示 Google 涂鸦，以庆祝您所在国家/地区特有的活动。
定制的搜索结果
例如，当您登录自己的 Google 帐号并启用“网络与应用活动记录”控制项后，Google 会根据您之前的搜索记录以及在其他 Google 服务中的活动向您提供更合乎您需求的搜索结果。您可以
点击此处了解详情
。即使您未登录帐号，也可以获得定制的搜索结果。如果您不需要这种级别的自定义搜索，可以
进行私密搜索和私密浏览
，或关闭
在未登录帐号时的搜索个性化设置
。
法律程序或强制性的政府要求
Google 与其他技术公司和通信公司一样，经常会收到世界各地的政府机构和法院发来的用户数据披露要求。对于您存储在 Google 的数据，我们一向注重保护其隐私和安全，在根据法律要求提供数据时，我们也会将这一点放在首位。我们的法律团队会审核每一项要求（无论其为何种类型），并且我们经常会在相应要求过于宽泛或不符合正确流程时将其驳回。 有关详情，请参阅我们的
透明度报告
。
防范滥用行为
例如，如果我们收到关于安全威胁的信息，就可以在认定您的帐号已遭到入侵时通知您，同时协助您采取措施保护您的帐号。
付款信息
例如，如果您向自己的 Google 帐号添加信用卡或其他付款方式，则可以使用相应付款方式在 Google 服务中购物，例如在 Play 商店中购买应用。我们可能还会要求您提供其他信息（例如营业税 ID），以便处理您的付款。在有些情况下，我们可能还需要验证您的身份，并且可能会要求您提供所需的信息。
在有些情况下，比如您输入了错误的出生日期，而该出生日期表明您未达到规定的年龄因而让您无法拥有 Google 帐号，那么我们可能还会利用付款信息来确认您是否符合年龄要求。
了解详情
负责处理您的信息的数据控制方
这是指负责处理您的信息并遵守适用隐私保护法的 Google 关联公司。
改进
例如，我们会利用 Cookie 分析用户与 Google 服务的互动情况，并可以根据分析结果打造更好的产品。例如，分析结果可能有助于我们发现用户完成某项任务用时过长或者根本无法完成所有步骤。这样一来，我们就可以针对所有用户重新设计相应功能并改进产品。
个性化广告
您可能还会看到根据广告主提供的信息投放的个性化广告。例如，如果您曾在某个广告主的网站上购物，则他们可以利用相应访问信息向您展示广告。
了解详情
公众
例如，如果收到从 Google 服务中
移除内容的要求
，我们会依据 Google 的内容移除政策或适用法律来处理与要求相关的信息，以便既能评估相应要求，又能确保我们的做法公开透明、更负责任，并防止要求被滥用/被用于进行欺诈。
检测滥用行为
如果我们在系统中检测到违反 Google 政策的垃圾邮件、恶意软件、非法内容（包括
儿童性虐待/剥削资料
）和其他形式的滥用行为，则可能会停用您的账号或采取其他适当措施。在某些情况下，我们可能还会向相应机构举报违规行为。
可公开访问的来源
例如，我们可能会收集网络上的公开信息或来自其他公开来源的信息，帮助训练 Google 的 AI 模型并打造实用产品和功能（比如 Google 翻译、Gemini 应用和 Cloud AI 功能）。如果商家的信息出现在了网站上，我们可能会将这些信息编入索引并显示在 Google 服务中。
可以关联信息
Google Analytics（分析）需要使用第一方 Cookie，即由 Google Analytics（分析）用户设置的 Cookie。如果您使用我们的系统，Google Analytics（分析）用户或 Google 可能会将通过 Google Analytics（分析）生成的数据关联到第三方 Cookie（这些 Cookie 用于记录对其他网站的访问）。例如，广告主可能会想要利用 Google Analytics（分析）数据制作更合乎用户需求的广告或进一步分析流量。
了解详情
来自您设备的传感器数据
您的设备可能包含相应的传感器，以便更好地了解您的位置和移动情况。例如，加速度计可用于检测您的速度，陀螺仪可用于检测行进方向。详细了解
Google 如何使用位置信息
。
浏览内容和广告的次数以及与它们互动的次数
例如，我们会收集关于广告的浏览次数和互动次数信息，以便向广告主提供汇总报告，例如让他们知道我们是否已将其广告投放到某个网页，以及浏览者是否有可能看到了相应广告，等等。我们可能还会衡量其他互动，例如您在广告上移动鼠标的方式，或您是否与广告所在的页面进行了互动。
敏感类别
向您展示个性化广告时，我们会根据您的活动使用我们认为您可能感兴趣的主题。例如，您可能会看到“烹饪和食谱”或“航空旅行”等方面的广告。我们不会使用基于种族、宗教、性取向或健康状况等敏感类别的广告主题或展示基于这些类别的个性化广告。我们
要求使用 Google 服务的广告主同样遵守这项规定
。
您觉得最有用的广告
例如，如果您在 YouTube 上观看有关烘焙的视频，那么在浏览网页时，可能会看到更多关于烘培的广告。我们可能还会根据您的 IP 地址确定您的大体位置，以便在您搜索“披萨”时为您投放关于附近披萨外卖服务的广告。详细
了解 Google 广告
以及
您会看到特定广告的原因
。
您已加标签的地点（例如家或工作地点）
您可以选择将对您非常重要的地点（例如家或工作地址）保存到您的 Google 账号中。如果您设置了家或工作地址，系统便可利用这些地址信息帮助您更轻松地处理大小事务，例如查询路线或查找离您家或工作地点更近的结果，以及看到更实用的广告。
您可随时在自己的
Google 账号
中修改或删除您的住址或工作地址信息。
您在其他网站和应用中的活动
这可能是您在使用 Google 服务时进行的活动，例如将您的帐号与 Chrome 同步，访问与 Google 合作的网站和应用，等等。很多网站和应用都选择与 Google 合作，以便改善他们的内容和服务。例如，网站可能会使用我们的广告服务（例如 AdSense）或分析工具（例如 Google Analytics（分析）），也可能会嵌入其他内容（例如 YouTube 视频）。这些服务可能会与 Google 分享您的活动信息，而 Google 可能会将这些数据与您的个人信息相关联，具体取决于您的
帐号设置
和所使用的产品（例如当合作伙伴结合使用 Google Analytics（分析）和我们的广告服务时）。
详细了解
当您使用我们的合作伙伴的网站或应用时 Google 会如何使用相关数据。
确保 Google 服务正常运行
例如，我们会持续监控我们的系统，以便及时发现问题。如果我们发现某项功能存在问题，那么查看在问题出现之前收集的活动信息将有助于我们更快地解决问题。
确保和改进
例如，我们会分析用户与广告的互动情况，以改善我们投放的广告的效果。
让公众受益
例如，我们会处理与从 Google 服务中
移除内容的要求
相关的信息，目的是让公众知情、为研究提供支持、确保这类要求公开透明。
设备
例如，我们可以利用来自您设备的信息帮助您确定在哪台设备上安装您从 Google Play 购买的应用或观看您从 Google Play 购买的影片。我们还会利用这些信息来帮助保护您的帐号。
设备周边事物的相关信息
如果您在 Android 设备上使用 Google 的位置信息服务，则我们可以对需要使用您的位置信息的应用（如 Google 地图）改进性能。如果您使用 Google 的位置信息服务，您的设备会向 Google 发送有关其位置、传感器（如加速度计）、附近基站和 Wi-Fi 接入点（如 MAC 地址和信号强度）的信息。所有这些信息都有助于我们确定您的位置。您可以通过设备设置启用 Google 位置信息服务。
了解详情
使用我们在各项 Google 服务中收集的信息
下面列举了一些示例，以便您了解我们会如何根据您的设置，使用在各项 Google 服务中收集的信息：
登录 Google 帐号后在 Google 中进行搜索时，您不仅可以看到来自公共网络的搜索结果，还可以看到您在其他 Google 产品（如 Gmail 或 Google 日历）中的内容的相关信息，这些信息可能包括您即将搭乘的航班的状态、餐厅和酒店预订，或您的照片。
了解详情
如果您通过 Gmail 与某人进行了联系并希望将对方添加到某个 Google 文档或 Google 日历活动中，方法很简单：当您开始输入对方的姓名时，Google 就会自动显示其电子邮件地址。此功能可让您更轻松地与您知道的人分享内容。
了解详情
Google 应用可以利用您存储在其他 Google 产品中的数据向您展示个性化内容，具体取决于您的设置。例如，如果您在“网络与应用活动记录”中存储了搜索记录，那么 Google 应用就可以根据您的活动记录，向您展示与您感兴趣的内容相关的新闻报道和其他信息，如赛事比分。
如果将您的 Google 账号与 Google Home 关联，您可以通过 Google 助理管理您的信息并处理各项事务。例如，您可以将活动添加到 Google 日历中或获取当天的日程安排，查询您即将搭乘的航班的最新状态，或者向自己的手机发送行车路线等信息。
了解详情
如果您是欧盟境内的用户，那么您在关联服务方面所做的决定将影响某些 Google 服务在各项 Google 服务中使用数据的方式。
适当的保护措施
例如，我们可能会对数据进行匿名或加密处理，以确保相关数据无法与您的其他信息相关联。
了解详情
特定 Google 服务
例如，您可以从 Blogger 中删除
您的博客
，或者从 Google 协作平台中删除
您拥有的 Google 协作平台
。您还可以删除自己在 Play 商店中对应用、游戏和其他内容的
评价
。
特定合作伙伴
例如，我们允许 YouTube 内容创作者和广告主同评估公司合作，以利用 Cookie 或类似技术了解其 YouTube 视频或广告的受众群体。再比如，我们的购物网页上的商家可以利用 Cookie 来了解有多少不同用户看过他们的产品详情。
详细了解
这些合作伙伴以及他们如何使用您的信息。
提供 Google 服务
我们会通过多种方式利用您的信息来提供 Google 服务，这些方式包括：
我们会利用您的设备分配到的 IP 地址向您发送您请求的数据，例如加载 YouTube 视频。
我们会利用您设备上的 Cookie 中存储的唯一标识符来帮助验证您的身份，确认您是否有权访问您的 Google 帐号。
我们会利用您上传到 Google 相册中的照片和视频帮助您创建可分享的影集、拼图和其他创作内容。
了解详情
我们可能会根据您收到的航班确认电子邮件在 Gmail 中创建“办理登机手续”按钮。
当您从 Google 购买服务或有形商品时，您可能会向我们提供诸如送货地址或配送说明等信息。我们会将这类信息用于处理、履行和配送订单，以及提供与您所购买的产品或服务相关的支持。
我们的用户
例如，为了防范滥用行为并确保我们的在线内容管理做法更公开透明、更负责任，如果收到从 Google 服务中移除内容的要求，我们会将与要求相关的数据分享给 Lumen。Lumen 会收集并分析这类要求，以便为研究提供支持，进而帮助互联网用户了解其权利。
了解详情
。
显示趋势
当有大量用户开始搜索某项内容时，我们可以从中了解与当时的特定趋势相关的实用信息。Google 趋势会对 Google 网页搜索内容进行抽样，从而评估在某个时间段内相关搜索内容的热门程度，并将这些结果以汇总的形式予以公开。
了解详情
需要使用 Cookie 才能正常运行
例如，我们会使用名为“lbcs”的 Cookie，以便您可以在一个浏览器中打开多个 Google 文档。阻止该 Cookie 会导致 Google 文档无法正常使用。
了解详情
移除
例如，如上所述，您可以根据适用法律（包括数据保护法）和我们的政策，
请求从特定 Google 服务中移除内容
，包括可能包含您个人信息的内容。
用于接打电话或收发消息的服务
此类服务的示例包括：
Google Voice，用于接打电话、发送短信和管理语音信箱
Google Meet，用于接打视频电话
Gmail，用于收发电子邮件
Google Chat，用于收发消息
Google Duo，用于接打视频电话和收发消息
Google Fi - 用于选择通话资费方案
与 Google 合作
有 200 多万个与 Google 合作展示广告的非 Google 网站和应用。
了解详情
与您的 Google 帐号同步
只有当您为 Chrome 启用了与 Google 帐号同步功能后，您的 Chrome 浏览记录才会保存到您的 Google 帐号名下。
了解详情
与生理/心理健康相关的类似信息
如果您使用我们提供的健身产品/应用（例如 Fitbit、Pixel Watch、Nest 或 Google 健身），我们会收集您提供的数据，例如您的身高和体重。我们还会从这些应用/设备中收集信息，例如您的睡眠模式、心率、体表温度、消耗卡路里数和行走步数。
语音和音频信息
例如，您可以选择是否希望 Google 在您与 Google 搜索、Google 助理和 Google 地图互动时将相关录音保存到您的 Google 帐号。当您的设备检测到“Ok Google”等语音启动指令时，Google 会将您接下来以及在您发出启动指令前的几秒内的语音和音频录制下来。
了解详情
在 Google 服务中的活动记录
如果您已登录 Google 帐号并开启了“网络与应用活动记录”，系统可能会将您在 Google 网站、应用和服务中的活动记录数据保存到您帐号的“网络与应用活动记录”中。某些活动记录可能会包含您在使用 Google 服务时所在大致区域的相关信息。当您使用大致区域信息进行搜索时，系统会在至少 3 平方公里的区域范围内搜索，或者会扩大搜索范围直到所覆盖的人口不少于 1,000 人。这有助于保护您的隐私。
在某些情况下，系统可能会使用您过去搜索时所在的区域推测与您的搜索相关的地点。例如，如果您身在西塘古镇时搜索了茶馆，Google 就可能会针对您日后的搜索显示有关西塘古镇的搜索结果。
您可在
我的活动记录
中查看和控制您的“网络与应用活动记录”。
在使用 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用中的活动
集成了广告、数据分析等 Google 服务的网站和应用会与我们分享信息。
无论您使用什么浏览器或浏览器模式，系统都会收集这类信息。例如，尽管 Chrome 中的无痕模式有助于防止使用您设备的其他人员得知您的浏览活动，但当您使用集成了 Google 服务的第三方网站和应用时，这些网站和应用仍可能会与 Google 分享信息。
您可以通过多种方式控制在您访问使用 Google 服务的网站和应用或与之互动时分享的信息，不妨
详细了解
一下其中的部分方式。
在网上哪些人对您来说最重要
例如，当您在所撰写电子邮件的“收件人”、“抄送”或“密送”字段中输入地址时，Gmail 会根据您
最常联系的人员
向您建议电子邮件地址。
Google
Google 大全
隐私权
条款
信息公开中心
一个下拉列表，用于更改网站语言。每个选项都是语言名称。共有 65 个语言选项。
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
主菜单
Google 应用